


Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft
















































































 United States


Personal Investing 




					            TRowePrice.com
					        



					            Personal Investing
					        



					            Workplace Retirement
					        



					            Institutional Investor
					        



					            Institutional Consultant
					        



					            Financial Advisor/Intermediary
					        



			            		Recordkeeping Sponsor/Consultant
			            	























Log Out
Log In


Open an Account
About Us
Help
















My Accounts





Portfolio


Transactions


Statements & Documents


Profile






Mutual Funds






Daily Prices




Historical Performance




Dividend Distributions




Mutual Fund Research Tool




Morningstar 4- and 5-Star Rated Funds




Stock Funds




Bond Funds




Target Date Funds




Asset Allocation Funds




Money Market Funds




Prospectuses & Reports







Retirement






IRA




Rollover IRA




Retirement Planning




Required Minimum Distributions




Small Business Retirement Plans




403(b) Plans







Planning & Research






Advice




Investing 101




Asset Allocation Planning




Retirement Planning




College Planning




Tax Planning




Estate Planning




Research & Analysis




T. Rowe Price Insights




Planning & Resources




Charitable Giving







Products & Services






ActivePlus Portfolios




College Savings Plans




Non Retirement Accounts




Private Asset Management




Select Client Services




Advisory Planning Services




Brokerage




Investor Centers





















T. Rowe Price Total Return Fund (PTTFX)









Home
	  	 / 
	  	 Mutual Funds









					T. Rowe Price
					
					
			
			
			
				Total Return Fund
				
			
		
	







Print this page
Email this page
Text size






Ticker Symbol:


			
				PTTFX
			
		


Fund Status:

Open to new Retail investors	   
					
					
				
				 / 
			
			
				
					
						Open to subsequent Retail investments











 





Snapshot

Objective

Performance

Composition

Management

Expenses/Minimums

Compare






		Fund Snapshot
	



Quick Stats



Current NAV
						
							as of
							
								07/26/2017
							
						



			  		
			  			
						  
						  
							$10.13
						  
						
					
				



NAV Change


					
			  			
						  
						  
							$0.02
						  
						
					
				



Daily YTD Return
							
								as of
								
									07/26/2017
								
							



						
							
								
								3.69%
							
						
					


NAV 12 Month Low-High

						
						  
						  
							
								$9.85
							
							-
							
								$10.16
							
						  
						
					



Net Assets
						
							as of
						    
								06/30/2017
						 	
						



					
						$31.50

					
					Million
				



Morningstar Ratings1


as of 06/30/2017



Overall

							
								
								
									N/A

								
							
						


3 Year

							
								
								
									N/A

								
							
						


5 Year

							
								
								
									N/A

								
							
						


10 Year

							
								
								
									N/A

								
							
						




				Morningstar rated the Total Return Fund among 
N/A,
N/A,
N/A
and 
N/A
Intermediate-Term Bond
funds for the overall rating and the 3-, 5-, and 10-year periods (as applicable) 
ending 06/30/2017, respectively.


The Overall Morningstar Rating for a managed product is derived from a weighted average of the performance 
figures associated with its three-, five-, and 10-year (if applicable) Morningstar Rating metrics. The 
weights are: 100% three-year rating for 36-59 months of total returns, 60% five-year rating/40% three-year 
rating for 60-119 months of total returns, and 50% 10-year rating/30% five-year rating/20% three-year rating 
for 120 or more months of total returns. While the 10-year overall star rating formula seems to give the most 
weight to the 10-year period, the most recent three-year period actually has the greatest impact because it is 
included in all three rating periods.
			

Performance Comparison
as of 
					
						06/30/2017
					
				







							This chart shows the value of a hypothetical $10,000 investment in the fund over the past 10 years or since its inception (for funds lacking 10-year records). The result is compared with benchmarks, which may include a broad-based market index and a peer group average or index. Market indexes do not include expenses, which are deducted from fund returns as well as mutual fund averages and indexes.
						
Benchmark Definitions



1 The Morningstar Rating for funds, or "star rating", is calculated for managed products (including mutual funds, 
variable annuity and variable life subaccounts, exchange-traded funds, closed-end funds, and separate accounts) with at 
least a three-year history. Exchange-traded funds and open-ended mutual funds are considered a single population for 
comparative purposes. It is calculated based on a Morningstar Risk-Adjusted Return measure that accounts for variation 
in a managed product's monthly excess performance, placing more emphasis on downward variations and rewarding consistent 
performance. The top 10% of products in each product category receive 5 stars, the next 22.5% receive 4 stars, the next 
35% receive 3 stars, the next 22.5% receive 2 stars, and the bottom 10% receive 1 star. The Overall Morningstar Rating 
for a managed product is derived from a weighted average of the performance figures associated with its three-, five-, 
and 10-year (if applicable) Morningstar Rating metrics. The weights are: 100% three-year rating for 36-59 months of 
total returns, 60% five-year rating/40% three-year rating for 60-119 months of total returns, and 50% 10-year rating/30% 
five-year rating/20% three-year rating for 120 or more months of total returns. While the 10-year overall star rating 
formula seems to give the most weight to the 10-year period, the most recent three-year period actually has the greatest 
impact because it is included in all three rating periods.

			

				
				
Source for Morningstar data: © 2017 Morningstar, Inc. All Rights Reserved. 
The information contained herein: (1) is proprietary to Morningstar and/or its content providers; 
(2) may not be copied or distributed; and (3) is not warranted to be accurate, complete or timely. 
Neither Morningstar nor its content providers are responsible for any damages or losses arising 
from any use of this information. Past performance is no guarantee of future results.
			



Average Annual Total Returns and Benchmarks











Benchmark Definitions

Investment Objective

			The fund seeks to maximize total return through income and capital appreciation.
		
30-Day Yield2 



Annualized Dividend
							
								as of 
								 
									(07/26/2017)
								
							



						
						
							2.87%
						
					



SEC Standardized w/ Waiver
							
								as of
								
									(06/30/2017)
								
							



						
							2.63%
						
					



SEC Standardized w/o Waiver
							
								as of
								
									(06/30/2017)
								
							



						
							1.07%
						
					


Average Annual Total Returns 3



 
MonthEnd
				06/30/2017
			
QuarterEnd
				06/30/2017
			


1 Year


				
					N/A
				
			

				
					N/A
				
			


3 Years

				
					N/A
				
			

				
					N/A
				
			


5 Years

				
					N/A
				
			

				
					N/A
				
			


10 Years

				
					N/A
				
			

				
					N/A
				
			


Since Inception

				
					
						2.68% 
						


				
					
						2.68%
						



Inception Date

						
							November 15, 2016
						
					




Gross Expense Ratio^


					
						0.72%
					
				





Net Expense Ratio^


					
						0.57%
					
				



Waiver Type

				
					
					
					
						Contractual
					
				
			


Limitation Expires

				
					
					
						
							September 30, 2018
						
					
				
			




				Current performance may be lower or higher than the quoted past performance, which cannot guarantee future results. 
Share price, principal value, yield and return will vary and you may have a gain or loss when you sell your shares.   
			



2 The 30-day dividend yield represents the average daily dividends for the 
30-day period, annualized and divided by the net asset values per share 
at the end of the period; it is available the first quarter after the 
fund's inception.  The SEC standardized yield is computed under an SEC 
standardized formula and reflects an estimated yield to maturity 
(assuming all portfolio securities are held to maturity); it is 
available the first month after the fund's inception.  
			

3
					
					Average annual total return figures include changes in principal value, reinvested dividends, and capital gain distributions. 
For funds less than one year old, the Since Inception return figure is not annualized and represents an aggregate total return.
				

^ The gross expense ratio reflects the fund expenses as stated in the fee table of the fund's 
prospectus prior to the deduction of any waiver or reimbursement. 
The net expense ratio reflects fund expenses after the deduction of any waiver or reimbursement.
If a fund has an active contractual expense ratio limitation, the expiration date is shown below the gross and net
expense ratio values above.  Expense ratios are as of the most recent prospectus.
	

























Open an Account




Transact & Trade




View/Update Accounts




Help Center












			Find a Fund
		



Select Fund By Name

Africa & Middle East - I Cl

Africa & Middle East Fund

Asia Opportunities

Asia Opportunities - I Cl

Balanced

Balanced - I Cl

Blue Chip Growth

Blue Chip Growth - I Cl

California Tax-Free Bond

California Tax-Free Bond - I Cl

California Tax-Free Money

California Tax-Free Money - I Cl

Capital Appreciation

Capital Appreciation - I Cl

Capital Opportunity

Capital Opportunity - I Cl

Cash Reserves

Corporate Income

Corporate Income - I Cl

Credit Opportunities

Credit Opportunities - I Cl

Diversified Mid-Cap Growth

Diversified Mid-Cap Growth - I Cl

Dividend Growth

Dividend Growth - I Cl

Dynamic Global Bond

Dynamic Global Bond - I Cl

Em Mkts Corporate Bond - I Cl

Em Mkts Local Currency Bond - I Cl

Emerging Europe

Emerging Europe - I Cl

Emerging Markets Bond

Emerging Markets Bond - I Cl

Emerging Markets Corporate Bond

Emerging Markets Local Currency Bond

Emerging Markets Stock

Emerging Markets Stock - I Cl

Emerging Markets Value Stock

Emerging Markets Value Stock - I Cl

Equity Income

Equity Income - I Cl

Equity Index 500

Equity Index 500 - I Cl

European Stock

European Stock - I Cl

Extended Equity Market Index

Financial Services

Financial Services - I Cl

Floating Rate

Floating Rate - I Cl

Georgia Tax-Free Bond

Georgia Tax-Free Bond - I Cl

Global Allocation

Global Allocation - I Cl

Global Consumer

Global Growth Stock

Global Growth Stock - I Cl

Global High Income Bond

Global High Income Bond - I Cl

Global Industrials

Global Industrials - I Cl

Global Multi-Sector Bond

Global Multi-Sector Bond - I Cl

Global Real Estate - I Cl

Global Real Estate Fund

Global Stock

Global Stock - I Cl

Global Technology - I Cl

Global Technology Fund

GNMA

GNMA - I Cl

Government Money

Government Money - I Cl

Growth & Income

Growth & Income - I Cl

Growth Stock

Growth Stock - I Cl

Health Sciences

Health Sciences - I Cl

High Yield

High Yield - I Cl

Inflation Protected Bond

Inflation Protected Bond - I Cl

Intermediate Tax-Free High Yield

Intermediate Tax-Free HY - I Cl

International Bond

International Bond - I Cl

International Concentrated Eq - I Cl

International Concentrated Equity

International Discovery

International Discovery - I Cl

International Equity Index

International Stock

International Stock - I Cl

International Value Equity

International Value Equity - I Cl

Japan

Japan - I Cl

Latin America

Latin America - I Cl

Limited Duration Inflation Focused Bd

Lmtd Duration Infl Focused Bd - I Cl

Maryland Short-Term Tax-Free Bond

Maryland Short-Term Tx-Fr Bnd - I Cl

Maryland Tax-Free Bond

Maryland Tax-Free Bond - I Cl

Maryland Tax-Free Money

Maryland Tax-Free Money - I Cl

Media & Telecommunications

Media & Telecommunications - I Cl

Mid-Cap Growth

Mid-Cap Growth - I Cl

Mid-Cap Value

Mid-Cap Value - I Cl

New America Growth

New America Growth - I Cl

New Asia

New Asia - I Cl

New Era

New Era - I Cl

New Horizons

New Horizons - I Cl

New Income

New Income - I Cl

New Jersey Tax-Free Bond

New Jersey Tax-Free Bond - I Cl

New York Tax-Free Bond

New York Tax-Free Bond - I Cl

New York Tax-Free Money

New York Tax-Free Money - I Cl

Overseas Stock - I Cl

Overseas Stock Fund

Personal Strategy Balanced

Personal Strategy Balanced - I Cl

Personal Strategy Growth

Personal Strategy Growth - I Cl

Personal Strategy Income

Personal Strategy Income - I Cl

QM Global Equity

QM Global Equity - I Cl

QM U.S. Small & Mid-Cap Core Eq - I Cl

QM U.S. Small & Mid-Cap Core Equity

QM U.S. Small-Cap Growth Equity

QM U.S. Small-Cap Growth Equity - I Cl

QM U.S. Value Equity

QM U.S. Value Equity - I Cl

Real Assets

Real Assets - I Cl

Real Estate

Real Estate - I Cl

Retirement 2005 Fund

Retirement 2010 Fund

Retirement 2015 Fund

Retirement 2020 Fund

Retirement 2025 Fund

Retirement 2030 Fund

Retirement 2035 Fund

Retirement 2040 Fund

Retirement 2045 Fund

Retirement 2050 Fund

Retirement 2055 Fund

Retirement 2060 Fund

Retirement Balanced Fund

Retirement Balanced I - I Cl

Retirement I 2005 - I Cl

Retirement I 2010 - I Cl

Retirement I 2015 - I Cl

Retirement I 2020 - I Cl

Retirement I 2025 - I Cl

Retirement I 2030 - I Cl

Retirement I 2035 - I Cl

Retirement I 2040 - I Cl

Retirement I 2045 - I Cl

Retirement I 2050 - I Cl

Retirement I 2055 - I Cl

Retirement I 2060 - I Cl

Retirement Income 2020

Science & Technology

Science & Technology - I Cl

Short-Term Bond

Short-Term Bond - I Cl

Small-Cap Stock

Small-Cap Stock - I Cl

Small-Cap Value

Small-Cap Value - I Cl

Spectrum Growth

Spectrum Income

Spectrum International

Summit Municipal Income

Summit Municipal Intermediate

Summit Municipal Money Market

Target 2005

Target 2005 - I Cl

Target 2010

Target 2010 - I Cl

Target 2015

Target 2015 - I Cl

Target 2020

Target 2020 - I Cl

Target 2025

Target 2025 - I Cl

Target 2030

Target 2030 - I Cl

Target 2035

Target 2035 - I Cl

Target 2040

Target 2040 - I Cl

Target 2045

Target 2045 - I Cl

Target 2050

Target 2050 - I Cl

Target 2055

Target 2055 - I Cl

Target 2060

Target 2060 - I Cl

Tax-Efficient Equity - I Cl

Tax-Efficient Equity Fund

Tax-Exempt Money

Tax-Exempt Money - I Cl

Tax-Free High Yield

Tax-Free High Yield - I Cl

Tax-Free Income

Tax-Free Income - I Cl

Tax-Free Short-Intermediate

Tax-Free Short-Intermediate - I Cl

Total Equity Market Index

Total Return

Total Return - I Cl

U.S. Bond Enhanced Index

U.S. High Yield

U.S. High Yield - I Cl

U.S. Large-Cap Core - I Cl

U.S. Large-Cap Core Fund

U.S. Treasury Intermediate

U.S. Treasury Intermediate - I Cl

U.S. Treasury Long-Term

U.S. Treasury Long-Term - I Cl

U.S. Treasury Money

U.S. Treasury Money - I Cl

Ultra Short-Term Bond

Ultra Short-Term Bond - I Cl

Value

Value - I Cl

Virginia Tax-Free Bond

Virginia Tax-Free Bond - I Cl




Select By Ticker Symbol
GTFBX
MDXBX
NJTFX
NYTXX
OTCFX
OTIIX
PBDIX
PCCOX
PCTXX
PDGIX
PEXMX
PGLOX
PGMSX
PGTIX
PIEQX
PNAIX
PNSIX
POMIX
PPIPX
PRAFX
PRAMX
PRASX
PRCIX
PRCNX
PRCOX
PRCPX
PRDGX
PRDMX
PRDSX
PREFX
PREIX
PRELX
PREMX
PRESX
PRFDX
PRFHX
PRFRX
PRFSX
PRGFX
PRGIX
PRGMX
PRGSX
PRGTX
PRHIX
PRHSX
PRHYX
PRIDX
PRIHX
PRIJX
PRIKX
PRINX
PRIPX
PRISX
PRITX
PRIUX
PRJIX
PRJPX
PRKIX
PRLAX
PRMDX
PRMSX
PRMTX
PRNEX
PRNHX
PRNYX
PRPIX
PRRXX
PRSCX
PRSGX
PRSIX
PRSMX
PRSNX
PRSVX
PRTAX
PRTIX
PRTXX
PRUFX
PRUIX
PRULX
PRUUX
PRVAX
PRVIX
PRWAX
PRWBX
PRWCX
PRXAX
PRXCX
PRXEX
PRXIX
PRZIX
PSILX
PTEXX
PTKIX
PTTFX
PTYIX
RBAIX
RCLIX
REIPX
REVIX
RGGIX
RICIX
RJAIX
RLAIX
RPBAX
RPEIX
RPGAX
RPGEX
RPGIX
RPGRX
RPIBX
RPIEX
RPIHX
RPISX
RPMGX
RPOIX
RPSIX
RPTFX
RPTIX
RPTTX
TBCIX
TBGAX
TBSIX
TCBXX
TCFEX
TCRRX
TECIX
TEEFX
TEIMX
TERXX
TEUIX
TFAIX
TFBIX
TFBVX
TFHAX
TFIFX
TFILX
TFRRX
TGAFX
TGIPX
TGTIX
THISX
TICCX
TIDDX
TIIPX
TIRGX
TIRRX
TMDXX
TOORX
TORFX
TPGPX
TPPAX
TQAIX
TQGEX
TQGIX
TQMVX
TQSIX
TQSMX
TQVIX
TRAIX
TRAMX
TRAOX
TRARX
TRASX
TRBCX
TRBFX
TRBRX
TRBUX
TRECX
TREMX
TRFFX
TRFGX
TRFOX
TRFWX
TRGAX
TRGLX
TRGRX
TRGXX
TRHRX
TRIGX
TRJIX
TRLAX
TRLDX
TRMCX
TRMIX
TRMUX
TRNEX
TRNXX
TROIX
TROSX
TRPAX
TRPBX
TRPCX
TRPDX
TRPFX
TRPHX
TRPIX
TRPJX
TRPKX
TRPLX
TRPMX
TRPNX
TRPPX
TRPTX
TRRAX
TRRBX
TRRCX
TRRDX
TRREX
TRRFX
TRRGX
TRRHX
TRRIX
TRRJX
TRRKX
TRRLX
TRRMX
TRRNX
TRROX
TRRTX
TRRUX
TRRVX
TRRWX
TRSGX
TRSTX
TRSXX
TRTFX
TRTIX
TRULX
TRVLX
TRVVX
TRXRX
TRYIX
TSCXX
TSNIX
TTEEX
TTGXX
TTMIX
TTOIX
TTRTX
TTSIX
TTURX
TUHIX
TUHYX
TWNXX
TWRRX


More






Fund Information



Download a Prospectus
Download a Semi-Annual Report
Download an Annual Report
Download Statement of Additional Information
Year-End Dividend Distributions
Year-End Tax Considerations
Dividend Distribution Dates

 





Related Links



Also available to certain investors as a lower cost I Class mutual fund.



























Our Mission Is Simple.
	          Help clients around the world achieve their long-term investment goals. 
	        


Connect with us
Facebook
Twitter
YouTube
LinkedIn




Company Overview
Responsibility
Careers
Investor Relations
Press Releases




Site Map
Privacy Policy
Terms of Use
Security Measures
Legal Information
Customer Agreement




Feedback
Mobile Solutions
Contact Us







The mutual funds referred to in this website are offered and sold only to persons residing in the United States and are offered by prospectus only. The prospectuses include investment objectives, risks, fees, expenses, and other information that you should read and consider carefully before investing.
Download a prospectus.

					©Thu Jul 27 11:34:42 EDT 2017. All Rights Reserved. T. Rowe Price Investment Services, Inc., distributor, T. Rowe Price mutual funds. T. ROWE PRICE, INVEST WITH CONFIDENCE, and the bighorn sheep design are trademarks of T. Rowe Price Group, Inc. 
					All other trademarks are the property of their respective owners. 
				











Morningstar 4- and 5-Star Rated Funds - Mutual Funds | T. Rowe Price | T. Rowe Price























 















Home
Mutual Funds
Morningstar 4- and 5-Star Rated Funds









Over 70 of our funds have earned 4- or 5-star Overall Morningstar Ratings as of 6/30/17.*









Invest Now

Call us at 877-495-1138



Download a Prospectus












Morningstar 4- and 5-Star Rated Funds




Stock Funds



U.S. Stock Funds



International and Global Stock Funds




Bond Funds



U.S. Bond Funds



International and Global Bond Funds




Target Date Funds



Retirement Funds



Target Funds



Income Funds




Asset Allocation Funds




Money Market Funds










                Find a fund
			














Browse all T. Rowe Price
 mutual funds
















Many of our mutual funds earn Morningstar’s highest ratings
Morningstar 4- and 5-Star Rated Funds







Because of our disciplined approach to investing, Morningstar, a leader in independent investment research, recognizes many of our mutual funds with its highest ratings in the funds' respective categories.

Over 70 of our funds have earned 4- or 5-star Overall Morningstar Ratings as of 6/30/17.*

Morningstar uses a 5-star system to rate mutual funds based on their risk-adjusted returns. Five stars is the highest while one star is the lowest rating. Only the top 32.5% of all funds (of the 32.5%, 10% get 5 stars and 22.5% get 4 stars) are awarded Morningstar's 4- or 5-star rating. By comparison, as of 6/30/17, 72 of 108 of our rated funds (Investor Class only) received an overall rating of 5 or 4 stars.​ Past performance cannot guarantee future results.

View all 4- and 5-star rated funds
 

Explore Morningstar 4- and 5-Star Rated Funds




Fund Name(ticker)
  


MorningstarCategory
  


Overall MorningstarRating™
  


No. ofFunds InCategory
  


Risk/RewardPotential**
  








Fund Name (ticker)

Morningstar Category

Overall Morningstar Rating™

No. of Funds In Category
Risk/Reward Potential









Compare Morningstar 4- and 5-Star Rated Funds












	            Find a fund
	        












Browse all T. Rowe Price mutual funds










T. Rowe Price Insights&reg



Markets & Economy

Monthly Market Review


		                        					Stay informed about global economic developments and our perspective on market conditions. Read more...






														
							    							 
							    							
														                    
		                							
		                  							Source:
		                  							
			                    						T. Rowe Price
		                    							
		                							
	                   							






Markets & Economy

Global Markets Weekly Update


		                        					Keep up-to-date on our views on developments in global capital markets. Read more...






														
							    							
							    							                      
								        						July 21, 2017 
							    							
														                    
		                							
		                  							Source:
		                  							
			                    						T. Rowe Price
		                    							
		                							
	                   							










All mutual funds are subject to market risk, including possible loss of principal.
*Morningstar gives its best ratings of 5 or 4 stars to the top 32.5% of all funds (of the 32.5%, 10% get 5 stars and 22.5% get 4 stars) based on their risk-adjusted returns. The Overall Morningstar Rating™ is derived from a weighted average of the performance figures associated with a fund's 3-, 5-, and 10-year (if applicable) Morningstar Rating™ metrics. As of 6/30/17, 72 of 108 of our rated funds (Investor class only) received an overall rating of 5 or 4 stars.
The Morningstar RatingTM for funds, or "star rating", is calculated for funds with at least a three-year history. Exchange-traded funds and open-ended mutual funds are considered a single population for comparative purposes. It is calculated based on a Morningstar Risk-Adjusted Return measure that accounts for variation in a managed product's monthly excess performance, placing more emphasis on downward variations and rewarding consistent performance. The top 10% of products in each product category receive 5 stars, the next 22.5% receive 4 stars, the next 35% receive 3 stars, the next 22.5% receive 2 stars, and the bottom 10% receive 1 star.

Source for Morningstar data: ©2017 Morningstar, Inc. All Rights Reserved. The information contained herein: (1) is proprietary to Morningstar and/or its content providers; (2) may not be copied or distributed; and (3) is not warranted to be accurate, complete or timely. Neither Morningstar nor its content providers are responsible for any damages or losses arising from any use of this information. Past performance is no guarantee of future results.
**This chart displays relative risk of each U.S. mutual fund listed using standard deviation of returns. Those values are provided in the bars at the top of the chart.
Methodology: We evaluate the standard deviation and its resulting placement within a specific risk/return category on an annual basis. A fund is generally placed in a risk/return category based on the 10-year standard deviation of its performance. If a fund is less than 10 years old, the actual fund performance history is supplemented with the primary prospectus benchmark history to obtain a full 10-year history, or longest time period available up to 10 years. For an Asset Allocation fund with less than 10 years of performance history, sub-strategy returns are used. When a sub-strategy is less than 10 years old, the actual sub-strategy performance history is supplemented with benchmark history to obtain a full 10-year history, or longest time period available up to 10 years.
Risk return categories overlap; a fund with a standard deviation in the overlap between two categories, denoted by a plus (+), is placed so that its risk categorization is better aligned with anticipated return characteristics an investor may experience going forward at the discretion of T Rowe Price.
When a fund has a cash-like benchmark, denoted by a double plus (++), its standard deviation is estimated using only available fund returns. If the fund is less than 10 years old, benchmark returns are not used to obtain a full 10-year history because they would artificially suppress the volatility estimate.
All investments are subject to market risk, including the possible loss of principal. Standard deviation of returns, a measure of price volatility, is one measure of risk. Please consult the funds’ prospectuses for a more complete discussion of the funds’ risks.
+ California Tax-Free Money Fund, Capital Appreciation Fund, Equity Income Fund, Global Allocation Fund, Global Industrials Fund, GNMA Fund, Inflation Protected Bond Fund, International Bond Fund, International Stock Fund, Japan Fund, Limited Duration Inflation Focused Bond Fund, New Era Fund, Personal Strategy Balanced Fund, Personal Strategy Income Fund, QM Global Equity Fund, QM Global Equity Fund, QM U.S. Value Equity Fund, Retirement 2015 Fund, Retirement 2035 Fund, Retirement 2040 Fund, Retirement 2045 Fund, Retirement 2050 Fund, Retirement 2055 Fund, Retirement 2060 Fund, Short-Term Bond Fund, Spectrum International Fund, Summit Municipal Intermediate Fund, Target 2010 Fund, Target 2025 Fund, Target 2050 Fund, Target 2055 Fund, Target 2060 Fund, Tax-Free Short-Intermediate Fund, Total Equity Market Index Fund, Ultra Short-Term Bond Fund
++ Global Unconstrained Bond Fund





















404 Page Not Found















Page Not Found




We apologize for any inconvenience, but we are unable to locate the page you requested. 
                                This could be due to either of the reasons below: 


                                    If you manually entered the URL, please make sure it is correct. 
                                    Check that the capitalization matches, that all words are spelled correctly, 
                                    and that all the punctuation, like periods (.) and slashes (/) are correctly placed. 
                                    Be sure that you are using the forward slash (/) and not the backward slash (\). 
                                    Remember, there are no spaces in URLs.
                                

                                    If you have bookmarked this page, this page may have been renamed, moved, or deleted. 
                                    Please return to our homepage, and reset your bookmarks.
                                












Roth or Traditional IRA  | T. Rowe Price





















 
















Home
Retirement
IRA
Roth or Traditional IRA 












Roth or Traditional IRA
Compare Roth and Traditional IRAs














Roth IRA
Traditional IRA
Roth or Traditional IRA 
Rollover and Transfer IRAs



    	Navigate To...
        



Roth IRA
Traditional IRA
Roth or Traditional IRA 
Rollover and Transfer IRAs





















When it comes to making a thoughtful decision between a Roth IRA and a Traditional IRA, it helps to understand the differences.










 
Roth IRA
Traditional IRA
Taxes
Contributions made are not deductible.
Contributions made can be tax-deductible or non-deductible. Deductibility of contributions depends on active participation in a retirement plan and your modified adjusted gross income (MAGI) not exceeding certain amounts.
Withdrawal of contributions

Withdraw anytime without taxes or penalties.
Withdraw anytime but deductible contributions are taxable and generally subject to penalties if withdrawn before age 59½.

Withdrawal of Earnings
Tax- and penalty-free when withdrawn at age 59½ if account has been active for at least five years.

Taxable when withdrawn and generally subject to penalties if withdrawn before age 59½.

Age restrictions
None.  
Must be under age 70½ during the tax year of the contribution.

Eligibility
May contribute only if, depending on filing status, MAGI does not exceed certain amounts. You must have US earned income.

No restrictions on contributions. You must have US earned income.  
Required minimum distributions (RMDs)
None during your lifetime.
Must begin taking for the year in which you reach age 70½.














Ready to Start? Call 1-877-583-2153









                        Open a Roth IRA
                    














                        Open a Traditional IRA
                    























Still Unsure About Roth vs. Traditional?











				    
						
				        
				            Answer four questions to find out which IRA may be right for you








































Why T. Rowe Price for a Roth or Traditional IRA?





Low Fees and Minimums.




 



You need to maximize your return potential, so we work to keep our fees competitive. That's why our solutions include no-load mutual funds with low expense ratios. Keep in mind that a Traditional IRA/Roth IRA may be subject to an annual fee, and a fee may be assessed when a Traditional IRA/Roth IRA is closed. Here's more information on fees.



















Convenient and Flexible Fund Choices.




 



You can choose from target date funds with strategic asset allocation and diversification, or select from more than 100 mutual funds to suit your investing needs.






            
                
                    
                    Download a Prospectus
                    
                
	            
	        
	    



















A Global Investing Network in Pursuit of Your Goals.




 



Our highly tenured global investment professionals are continuously assessing potential risk, while identifying opportunities to maximize growth potential over the long term so you have more money in retirement.  





























Want to Move Existing Savings Into a Roth IRA?

















Roll over a 401(k)













A Rollover IRA is one of several options to consider for your former workplace retirement plan, such as a 401(k).
 
Explore your options
Roll over now
 

















Transfer an existing IRA












If you decide to transfer an IRA, we offer over 100 mutual funds from which to choose. And we make it easy by handling most of the paperwork, too.
Transfer an IRA now


















Convert your T. Rowe Price Traditional IRA to a Roth IRA









A Roth IRA offers many advantages over a Traditional IRA, like potentially tax-free withdrawals if you need them.
Convert now




































404 Page Not Found















Page Not Found




We apologize for any inconvenience, but we are unable to locate the page you requested. 
                                This could be due to either of the reasons below: 


                                    If you manually entered the URL, please make sure it is correct. 
                                    Check that the capitalization matches, that all words are spelled correctly, 
                                    and that all the punctuation, like periods (.) and slashes (/) are correctly placed. 
                                    Be sure that you are using the forward slash (/) and not the backward slash (\). 
                                    Remember, there are no spaces in URLs.
                                

                                    If you have bookmarked this page, this page may have been renamed, moved, or deleted. 
                                    Please return to our homepage, and reset your bookmarks.
                                






























 



 Cohen & Steers Total Return Realty Fund, Inc. (RFI) Notification of Sources of Distribution Under 
         










    










 













 











 



















Cohen & Steers Total Return Realty Fund, Inc. (RFI) Notification of Sources of Distribution Under Section 19(a)
        																																
              











 News provided by
Cohen & Steers  
Jul 24, 2017, 17:56 ET









 Share this article




























































NEW YORK, July 24, 2017 /PRNewswire/ -- This press release provides shareholders of Cohen & Steers Total Return Realty Fund, Inc. (NYSE:    RFI) (the "Fund") with information regarding the sources of the distribution to be paid on July 31, 2017 and cumulative distributions paid fiscal year-to-date.








In December 2011, the Fund implemented a managed distribution policy in accordance with exemptive relief issued by the Securities and Exchange Commission. The managed distribution policy seeks to deliver the Fund's long-term total return potential through regular monthly distributions declared at a fixed rate per common share. The policy gives the Fund greater flexibility to realize long-term capital gains throughout the year and to distribute those gains on a regular monthly basis to shareholders. The Board of Directors of the Fund may amend, terminate or suspend the managed distribution policy at any time, which could have an adverse effect on the market price of the Fund's shares.  
The Fund's monthly distributions may include long-term capital gains, short-term capital gains, net investment income and/or return of capital for federal income tax purposes. Return of capital includes distributions paid by the Fund in excess of its net investment income and net realized capital gains and such excess is distributed from the Fund's assets. A return of capital is not taxable; rather, it reduces a shareholder's tax basis in his or her shares of the Fund. In addition, distributions from the Fund's investments in real estate investment trusts (REITs) may later be characterized as capital gains and/or a return of capital, depending on the character of the dividends reported to the Fund after year-end by REITs held by the Fund. The amount of monthly distributions may vary depending on a number of factors, including changes in portfolio and market conditions.
At the time of each monthly distribution, information will be posted to cohenandsteers.com and mailed to shareholders in a concurrent notice. However, this information may change at the end of the year because the final tax characteristics of the Fund's distributions cannot be determined with certainty until after the end of the calendar year. Final tax characteristics of all of the Fund's distributions will be provided on Form 1099-DIV, which is mailed after the close of the calendar year.
The following table sets forth the estimated amounts of the current distribution and the cumulative distributions paid this fiscal year-to-date from the sources indicated. All amounts are expressed per common share.




 DISTRIBUTION ESTIMATES 
 July 2017 
 YEAR-TO-DATE (YTD)  July 31, 2017* 


 Source 
 Per Share Amount 
 % of Current Distribution 
 Per Share Amount 
 % of 2017 Distributions 


 Net Investment Income 
 $0.0000 
 0.00% 
 $0.1479 
 26.41% 


 Net Realized Short-Term Capital Gains 
 $0.0000 
 0.00% 
 $0.0000 
 0.00% 


 Net Realized Long-Term Capital Gains 
 $0.0612 
 76.50% 
 $0.3914 
 69.89% 


 Return of Capital (or other Capital Source) 
 $0.0188 
 23.50% 
 $0.0207 
 3.70% 


 Total Current Distribution 
 $0.0800 
 100.00% 
 $0.5600 
 100.00% 




You should not draw any conclusions about the Fund's investment performance from the amount of this distribution or from the terms of the Fund's managed distribution policy. The Fund estimates that it has distributed more than its income and capital gains; therefore, a portion of your distribution may be a return of capital. A return of capital may occur, for example, when some or all of the money that you invested in the Fund is paid back to you. A return of capital distribution does not necessarily reflect the Fund's investment performance and should not be confused with 'yield' or 'income'. The amounts and sources of distributions reported in this Notice are only estimates, are likely to change over time, and are not being provided for tax reporting purposes. The actual amounts and sources of the amounts for accounting and tax reporting purposes will depend upon the Fund's investment experience during the remainder of its fiscal year and may be subject to changes based on tax regulations. The amounts and sources of distributions year-to-date may be subject to additional adjustments.
*THE FUND WILL SEND YOU A FORM 1099-DIV FOR THE CALENDAR YEAR THAT WILL TELL YOU HOW TO REPORT THESE DISTRIBUTIONS FOR FEDERAL INCOME TAX PURPOSES.
The Fund's Year-to-date Cumulative Total Return for fiscal year 2017 (January 1, 2017 through June 30, 2017) is set forth below. Shareholders should take note of the relationship between the Year-to-date Cumulative Total Return with the Fund's Cumulative Distribution Rate for 2017. In addition, the Fund's Average Annual Total Return for the five-year period ending June 30, 2017 is set forth below. Shareholders should note the relationship between the Average Annual Total Return with the Fund's Current Annualized Distribution Rate for 2017. The performance and distribution rate information disclosed in the table is based on the Fund's net asset value per share (NAV). The Fund's NAV is calculated as the total market value of all the securities and other assets held by the Fund minus the total liabilities, divided by the total number of shares outstanding. While NAV performance may be indicative of the Fund's investment performance, it does not measure the value of a shareholder's individual investment in the Fund. The value of a shareholder's investment in the Fund is determined by the Fund's market price, which is based on the supply and demand for the Fund's shares in the open market. 
Fund Performance and Distribution Rate Information: 




 Year-to-date January 1, 2017 to June 30, 2017 


 Year-to-date Cumulative Total Return1 
 5.02% 


 Cumulative Distribution Rate2 
 4.15% 





 Five-year period ending June 30, 2017 


 Average Annual Total Return3 
 9.85% 


 Current Annualized Distribution Rate4 
 7.11% 








 1. 
 Year-to-date Cumulative Total Return is the percentage change in the Fund's NAV over the year-to-date time period including distributions paid and assuming reinvestment of those distributions. 


 2. 
 Cumulative Distribution Rate for the Fund's current fiscal period (January 1, 2017 through June 30, 2017) measured on the dollar value of distributions in the year-to-date period as a percentage of the Fund's NAV as of June 30, 2017. 


 3. 
 Average Annual Total Return represents the compound average of the Annual NAV Total Returns of the Fund for the five-year period ending June 30, 2017. Annual NAV Total Return is the percentage change in the Fund's NAV over a year including distributions paid and assuming reinvestment of those distributions. 


 4. 
 The Current Annualized Distribution Rate is the current fiscal period's distribution rate annualized as a percentage of the Fund's NAV as of June 30, 2017.  




Investors should consider the investment objectives, risks, charges and expense of the fund carefully before investing. You can obtain the fund's most recent periodic reports, when available, and other regulatory filings by contacting your financial advisor or visiting cohenandsteers.com. These reports and other filings can be found on the Securities and Exchange Commission's EDGAR Database. You should read these reports and other filings carefully before investing. 
Shareholders should not use the information provided in preparing their tax returns. Shareholders will receive a Form 1099-DIV for the calendar year indicating how to report Fund distributions for federal income tax purposes.
Website: http://cohenandsteers.com/ Symbol: (NYSE:    CNS)
About Cohen & Steers. Cohen & Steers is a global investment manager specializing in liquid real assets, including real estate securities, listed infrastructure, commodities and natural resource equities, as well as preferred securities and other income solutions. Founded in 1986, the firm is headquartered in New York City, with offices in London, Hong Kong, Tokyo and Seattle. 
 
View original content:http://www.prnewswire.com/news-releases/cohen--steers-total-return-realty-fund-inc-rfi-notification-of-sources-of-distribution-under-section-19a-300493190.html
SOURCE Cohen & Steers
 Related Links

http://www.cohenandsteers.com



 












Jul 24, 2017, 18:11 ET
Preview: Cohen & Steers Quality Income Realty Fund, Inc. (RQI) Notification of Sources of Distribution Under Section 19(a)













Jul 24, 2017, 17:50 ET
Preview: Cohen & Steers Limited Duration Preferred and Income Fund, Inc. (LDP) Notification of Sources of Distribution Under Section 19(a)






My News


  Release contains wide tables.	  View fullscreen.






 Also from this source




 

Jul 24, 2017, 18:18 ET
                                  				                                                                                     
                              Cohen & Steers Select Preferred and Income Fund, Inc. (PSF)...








 

Jul 24, 2017, 18:11 ET
                                  				                                                                                     
                              Cohen & Steers Quality Income Realty Fund, Inc. (RQI)...





 Explore
 More news releases in similar topics

  Banking & Financial Services
  Mutual Funds
Dividends








 You just read:
Cohen & Steers Total Return Realty Fund, Inc. (RFI) Notification of Sources of Distribution Under Section 19(a)


 News provided by
Cohen & Steers  
Jul 24, 2017, 17:56 ET








 Share this article









































 











Looking to send a news release with PR Newswire?
Take advantage of the world's leading distribution platform.
Sign up to get started
Request more information
Have an account? Log In

















Search











Searching for your content...









Advanced Search












































 


﻿
































Cohen & Steers infrastucture Fund Inc Plans Monthly Dividend of $0.13 (UTF) - Markets Daily













































 
























 




 





















Daily Ratings & News for Cohen & Steers infrastucture Fund Inc
        	Complete the form below to receive the latest headlines and analysts' recommendationsfor Cohen & Steers infrastucture Fund Inc with our free daily email newsletter:



 





Follow @TheMarketsDaily


The Markets Daily









Recent Posts

McDonald’s Corporation (NYSE:MCD) Given “Buy” Rating at Instinet
Netflix, Inc. (NASDAQ:NFLX) Shares Sold by CHURCHILL MANAGEMENT Corp
William Blair Analysts Boost Earnings Estimates for Netflix, Inc. (NASDAQ:NFLX)
Reviewing Gold Fields Limited (GFI) and Franco-Nevada Corporation (NYSE:FNV)
SandRidge Mississippian Trust II (SDR) versus Mid-Con Energy Partners, (MCEP) Head-To-Head Analysis
$0.06 EPS Expected for World Wrestling Entertainment, Inc. (WWE) This Quarter
$0.24 EPS Expected for Ruth’s Hospitality Group, Inc. (NASDAQ:RUTH) This Quarter
Dover Corporation (DOV) Price Target Raised to $90.00
Dynegy Inc. (DYN) Bond Prices Fall 1%
Nucor Corporation (NUE) Earns Buy Rating from Morgan Stanley
Webster Financial Co. (NYSE:WBS) Releases  Earnings Results, Beats Estimates By $0.04 EPS
Brokerages Expect Belden Inc (NYSE:BDC) Will Announce Quarterly Sales of $608.00 Million
Zacks: Brokerages Expect Nordson Corporation (NASDAQ:NDSN) Will Announce Quarterly Sales of $575.60 Million
Financial Contrast: Home Depot, Inc. (The) (HD) and Lumber Liquidators Holdings (LL)
Head-To-Head Analysis: BJ’s Restaurants (BJRI) & Texas Roadhouse (TXRH)
Dalton Greiner Hartman Maher & Co. Has $14.30 Million Stake in Analog Devices, Inc. (ADI)
Hortonworks, Inc. (NASDAQ:HDP) Rating Lowered to Hold at Zacks Investment Research
Guaranty Bancorp (GBNK) Upgraded to “Buy” by Zacks Investment Research
Check Point Software Technologies’ (CHKP) Buy Rating Reiterated at Cowen and Company
KeyCorp’s (KEY) Buy Rating Reaffirmed at Piper Jaffray Companies




 


Cohen & Steers infrastucture Fund Inc Plans Monthly Dividend of $0.13 (UTF)

					Posted by Mitch Edgeman on Jul 14th, 2017 // No Comments 




Cohen & Steers infrastucture Fund Inc (NYSE:UTF) declared a monthly dividend on Wednesday, March 29th, Wall Street Journal reports. Investors of record on Thursday, June 22nd will be paid a dividend of 0.134 per share by the investment management company on Friday, June 30th. This represents a $1.61 annualized dividend and a dividend yield of 6.96%. The ex-dividend date is Tuesday, June 20th. 
Cohen & Steers infrastucture Fund has increased its dividend payment by an average of 3.6% per year over the last three years. 


 Get Cohen & Steers infrastucture Fund Inc alerts:



Shares of Cohen & Steers infrastucture Fund (NYSE UTF) traded up 0.43% during mid-day trading on Friday, hitting $23.09. 232,241 shares of the stock were exchanged. Cohen & Steers infrastucture Fund has a 12 month low of $19.10 and a 12 month high of $23.93. The stock’s 50 day moving average is $23.24 and its 200 day moving average is $21.55. 
ILLEGAL ACTIVITY NOTICE: This piece was originally  published by Markets Daily and is owned by of Markets Daily. If you are accessing this piece on another site, it was stolen and reposted in violation of United States and international trademark & copyright legislation. The correct version of this piece can be accessed at https://www.themarketsdaily.com/2017/07/14/cohen-steers-infrastucture-fund-inc-plans-monthly-dividend-of-0-13-utf.html. 




About Cohen & Steers infrastucture Fund
Cohen & Steers Infrastructure Fund, Inc (the Fund) is a diversified closed-end management investment company. The Fund’s investment objective is total return with emphasis on income. Its portfolio of investments includes banks, electric, financial, insurance, industrials, airports, railways, toll roads, pipelines, gas distribution, real estate, water, telecommunications and utilities.







Receive News & Ratings for Cohen & Steers infrastucture Fund Inc Daily - Enter your email address below to receive a concise daily summary of the latest news and analysts' ratings for Cohen & Steers infrastucture Fund Inc and related companies with MarketBeat.com's FREE daily email newsletter.



 





























Latest News






Leave a Reply

Click here to cancel reply.




Name  (Required) 



Mail (will not be published)  (Required) 



Website















































































 



 Cohen & Steers Total Return Realty Fund, Inc. (RFI) Notification of Sources of Distribution Under 
         










    










 













 











 



















Cohen & Steers Total Return Realty Fund, Inc. (RFI) Notification of Sources of Distribution Under Section 19(a)
        																																
              











 News provided by
Cohen & Steers  
Jul 24, 2017, 17:56 ET









 Share this article




























































NEW YORK, July 24, 2017 /PRNewswire/ -- This press release provides shareholders of Cohen & Steers Total Return Realty Fund, Inc. (NYSE:    RFI) (the "Fund") with information regarding the sources of the distribution to be paid on July 31, 2017 and cumulative distributions paid fiscal year-to-date.








In December 2011, the Fund implemented a managed distribution policy in accordance with exemptive relief issued by the Securities and Exchange Commission. The managed distribution policy seeks to deliver the Fund's long-term total return potential through regular monthly distributions declared at a fixed rate per common share. The policy gives the Fund greater flexibility to realize long-term capital gains throughout the year and to distribute those gains on a regular monthly basis to shareholders. The Board of Directors of the Fund may amend, terminate or suspend the managed distribution policy at any time, which could have an adverse effect on the market price of the Fund's shares.  
The Fund's monthly distributions may include long-term capital gains, short-term capital gains, net investment income and/or return of capital for federal income tax purposes. Return of capital includes distributions paid by the Fund in excess of its net investment income and net realized capital gains and such excess is distributed from the Fund's assets. A return of capital is not taxable; rather, it reduces a shareholder's tax basis in his or her shares of the Fund. In addition, distributions from the Fund's investments in real estate investment trusts (REITs) may later be characterized as capital gains and/or a return of capital, depending on the character of the dividends reported to the Fund after year-end by REITs held by the Fund. The amount of monthly distributions may vary depending on a number of factors, including changes in portfolio and market conditions.
At the time of each monthly distribution, information will be posted to cohenandsteers.com and mailed to shareholders in a concurrent notice. However, this information may change at the end of the year because the final tax characteristics of the Fund's distributions cannot be determined with certainty until after the end of the calendar year. Final tax characteristics of all of the Fund's distributions will be provided on Form 1099-DIV, which is mailed after the close of the calendar year.
The following table sets forth the estimated amounts of the current distribution and the cumulative distributions paid this fiscal year-to-date from the sources indicated. All amounts are expressed per common share.




 DISTRIBUTION ESTIMATES 
 July 2017 
 YEAR-TO-DATE (YTD)  July 31, 2017* 


 Source 
 Per Share Amount 
 % of Current Distribution 
 Per Share Amount 
 % of 2017 Distributions 


 Net Investment Income 
 $0.0000 
 0.00% 
 $0.1479 
 26.41% 


 Net Realized Short-Term Capital Gains 
 $0.0000 
 0.00% 
 $0.0000 
 0.00% 


 Net Realized Long-Term Capital Gains 
 $0.0612 
 76.50% 
 $0.3914 
 69.89% 


 Return of Capital (or other Capital Source) 
 $0.0188 
 23.50% 
 $0.0207 
 3.70% 


 Total Current Distribution 
 $0.0800 
 100.00% 
 $0.5600 
 100.00% 




You should not draw any conclusions about the Fund's investment performance from the amount of this distribution or from the terms of the Fund's managed distribution policy. The Fund estimates that it has distributed more than its income and capital gains; therefore, a portion of your distribution may be a return of capital. A return of capital may occur, for example, when some or all of the money that you invested in the Fund is paid back to you. A return of capital distribution does not necessarily reflect the Fund's investment performance and should not be confused with 'yield' or 'income'. The amounts and sources of distributions reported in this Notice are only estimates, are likely to change over time, and are not being provided for tax reporting purposes. The actual amounts and sources of the amounts for accounting and tax reporting purposes will depend upon the Fund's investment experience during the remainder of its fiscal year and may be subject to changes based on tax regulations. The amounts and sources of distributions year-to-date may be subject to additional adjustments.
*THE FUND WILL SEND YOU A FORM 1099-DIV FOR THE CALENDAR YEAR THAT WILL TELL YOU HOW TO REPORT THESE DISTRIBUTIONS FOR FEDERAL INCOME TAX PURPOSES.
The Fund's Year-to-date Cumulative Total Return for fiscal year 2017 (January 1, 2017 through June 30, 2017) is set forth below. Shareholders should take note of the relationship between the Year-to-date Cumulative Total Return with the Fund's Cumulative Distribution Rate for 2017. In addition, the Fund's Average Annual Total Return for the five-year period ending June 30, 2017 is set forth below. Shareholders should note the relationship between the Average Annual Total Return with the Fund's Current Annualized Distribution Rate for 2017. The performance and distribution rate information disclosed in the table is based on the Fund's net asset value per share (NAV). The Fund's NAV is calculated as the total market value of all the securities and other assets held by the Fund minus the total liabilities, divided by the total number of shares outstanding. While NAV performance may be indicative of the Fund's investment performance, it does not measure the value of a shareholder's individual investment in the Fund. The value of a shareholder's investment in the Fund is determined by the Fund's market price, which is based on the supply and demand for the Fund's shares in the open market. 
Fund Performance and Distribution Rate Information: 




 Year-to-date January 1, 2017 to June 30, 2017 


 Year-to-date Cumulative Total Return1 
 5.02% 


 Cumulative Distribution Rate2 
 4.15% 





 Five-year period ending June 30, 2017 


 Average Annual Total Return3 
 9.85% 


 Current Annualized Distribution Rate4 
 7.11% 








 1. 
 Year-to-date Cumulative Total Return is the percentage change in the Fund's NAV over the year-to-date time period including distributions paid and assuming reinvestment of those distributions. 


 2. 
 Cumulative Distribution Rate for the Fund's current fiscal period (January 1, 2017 through June 30, 2017) measured on the dollar value of distributions in the year-to-date period as a percentage of the Fund's NAV as of June 30, 2017. 


 3. 
 Average Annual Total Return represents the compound average of the Annual NAV Total Returns of the Fund for the five-year period ending June 30, 2017. Annual NAV Total Return is the percentage change in the Fund's NAV over a year including distributions paid and assuming reinvestment of those distributions. 


 4. 
 The Current Annualized Distribution Rate is the current fiscal period's distribution rate annualized as a percentage of the Fund's NAV as of June 30, 2017.  




Investors should consider the investment objectives, risks, charges and expense of the fund carefully before investing. You can obtain the fund's most recent periodic reports, when available, and other regulatory filings by contacting your financial advisor or visiting cohenandsteers.com. These reports and other filings can be found on the Securities and Exchange Commission's EDGAR Database. You should read these reports and other filings carefully before investing. 
Shareholders should not use the information provided in preparing their tax returns. Shareholders will receive a Form 1099-DIV for the calendar year indicating how to report Fund distributions for federal income tax purposes.
Website: http://cohenandsteers.com/ Symbol: (NYSE:    CNS)
About Cohen & Steers. Cohen & Steers is a global investment manager specializing in liquid real assets, including real estate securities, listed infrastructure, commodities and natural resource equities, as well as preferred securities and other income solutions. Founded in 1986, the firm is headquartered in New York City, with offices in London, Hong Kong, Tokyo and Seattle. 
 
View original content:http://www.prnewswire.com/news-releases/cohen--steers-total-return-realty-fund-inc-rfi-notification-of-sources-of-distribution-under-section-19a-300493190.html
SOURCE Cohen & Steers
 Related Links

http://www.cohenandsteers.com



 












Jul 24, 2017, 18:11 ET
Preview: Cohen & Steers Quality Income Realty Fund, Inc. (RQI) Notification of Sources of Distribution Under Section 19(a)













Jul 24, 2017, 17:50 ET
Preview: Cohen & Steers Limited Duration Preferred and Income Fund, Inc. (LDP) Notification of Sources of Distribution Under Section 19(a)






My News


  Release contains wide tables.	  View fullscreen.






 Also from this source




 

Jul 24, 2017, 18:18 ET
                                  				                                                                                     
                              Cohen & Steers Select Preferred and Income Fund, Inc. (PSF)...








 

Jul 24, 2017, 18:11 ET
                                  				                                                                                     
                              Cohen & Steers Quality Income Realty Fund, Inc. (RQI)...





 Explore
 More news releases in similar topics

  Banking & Financial Services
  Mutual Funds
Dividends








 You just read:
Cohen & Steers Total Return Realty Fund, Inc. (RFI) Notification of Sources of Distribution Under Section 19(a)


 News provided by
Cohen & Steers  
Jul 24, 2017, 17:56 ET








 Share this article









































 











Looking to send a news release with PR Newswire?
Take advantage of the world's leading distribution platform.
Sign up to get started
Request more information
Have an account? Log In

















Search











Searching for your content...









Advanced Search












































 




Cohen & Steers Total Return Realty Fund (NYSE: RFI)






























































open








Please enter your password to update your profile


Log In















Forgot your password?








Register
Register to access customized content available only to registered users.














Log In














Incorrect email. Please try again or Register.


Register
Register to access customized content available only to registered users.












This information is only available to users outside the United States


Click here to go back

Change view





The Cohen & Steers Active Commodities Fund (the “Fund”) is a sub-fund of the Cohen & Steers Funds ICAV, a qualifying investor alternative investment fund registered in Ireland. In general, shares of the Fund (“Shares”) may only be offered and sold to “qualifying investors”, as such term is defined by the Central Bank of Ireland (“Qualifying Investors”), and only in certain jurisdictions. In particular, Shares may not be offered or sold, directly or indirectly to investors in the United States, except as explicitly noted in the Fund’s prospectus and supplement, or in the European Union other than in Ireland, the United Kingdom, the Netherlands, and Luxembourg. By clicking below, you confirm that you are a Qualifying Investor located in a jurisdiction where Shares may be offered or sold.


Confirm





Funds > U.S. Closed-End Funds 

Cohen & Steers 
Total Return Realty Fund








	The investment objective of the Fund is to achieve a high total return through investment in real estate securities. Real estate securities include common stocks, preferred stocks and other equity securities of any market capitalization issued by real estate companies, including real estate investment trusts (REITs) and similar REIT-like entities.

Characteristics (Click to expand)




Symbol




RFI





Total Net Assets

$352.9 Million
(At 6/30/17)



Common Assets Expense Ratio

0.85%



No. of holdings

115



NAV per share

$13.54



Distribution Rate

7.53%



SEC Yield

1.90%



Monthly Distribution Per Share

$0.08



Inception Date

9/27/93








                                            Top 10 Holdings
                                            June 30, 2017





Name

                                                        
                                                            Sector
                                                        
                                                    

                                                        % of Market Value
                                                        
                                                    




Simon Property Group Inc.
Regional Mall
4.9


UDR Inc.
Apartment
4.4


Equinix Inc.
Data Centers
4.3


Prologis Inc.
Industrial
4.2


Equity Residential
Apartment
3.5


Essex Property Trust Inc.
Apartment
3.0


Kilroy Realty Corp.
Office
2.7


American Campus Communities
Apartment
2.6


Healthcare Trust of America
Health Care
2.5


Host Hotels & Resorts Inc.
Hotel
2.5







Portfolio Managers






Thomas Bohjalian
Executive Vice President







William Scapell
Executive Vice President







Jason A. Yablon
Senior Vice President










Characteristics (Click to expand)




Symbol




RFI





Total Net Assets

$352.9 Million
(At 6/30/17)



Common Assets Expense Ratio

0.85%



No. of holdings

115



NAV per share

$13.54



Distribution Rate

7.53%



SEC Yield

1.90%



Monthly Distribution Per Share

$0.08



Inception Date

9/27/93







Total ReturnsJune 30, 2017




PeriodRFI Mkt PriceRFI NAVFTSE NAREIT Equity REIT IndexS&P 500 Index




QTD
4.06%
2.82%
1.52%
3.09%

1 Year
-2.98%
0.94%
-1.70%
17.90%

3 Year
9.92%
9.16%
8.35%
9.61%

5 Year
8.70%
9.85%
9.52%
14.63%

10 Year
6.99%
7.37%
6.00%
7.18%

Since Inception (9/27/93)
9.48%
10.14%
10.04%
9.39%





Since inception FTSE NAREIT Equity REIT Index calculated from the nearest month end.
Performance data quoted represents past performance. Past performance is no guarantee of future results.The rate of return will vary and the principal value of an investment will fluctuate and shares, if sold, may be worth more or less than their original cost. Current performance may be lower or higher than the performance data quoted. Returns are historical and include change in share price and reinvestment of all distributions. An investor cannot invest directly in an index and index performance does not reflect the deduction of any fees, expenses or taxes.
Periods greater than 12 months are annualized. Returns are historical and include change in share price and reinvestment of all distributions.
The FTSE NAREIT Equity REIT Index is an unmanaged, market-capitalization-weighted index of all publicly traded U.S. REITs that invest predominantly in the equity ownership of real estate, not including timber and infrastructure. The index is designed to reflect the performance of all publicly traded equity REITs as a whole.
The S&P 500 Index is an unmanaged index of 500 large-cap stocks that is frequently used as a general measure of stock market performance. It includes 500 large-cap stocks, which together represent about 75% of the total U.S. equities market. To be eligible for addition to the S&P 500, companies must have a market capitalization of at least US$ 4 billion.
Barclays Capital U.S. Aggregate Bond Index includes U.S. government, corporate and mortgage-backed securities with maturities of at least one year.
The Barclays Capital 10-Year U.S. Treasury Bellwether Index is an unmanaged index of U.S. Treasury bonds with 10 years' maturity.
An investor cannot invest directly in an index and index performance does not reflect the deduction of any fees, expenses or taxes.
For information on the distribution yield of this fund, click here.







Characteristics (Click to expand)




Symbol




RFI





Total Net Assets

$352.9 Million
(At 6/30/17)



Common Assets Expense Ratio

0.85%



No. of holdings

115



NAV per share

$13.54



Distribution Rate

7.53%



SEC Yield

1.90%



Monthly Distribution Per Share

$0.08



Inception Date

9/27/93







Sector DiversificationJune 30, 2017




Sector Name
Percent




Preferreds
17%

Apartment
16%

Office
13%

Data Centers
9%

Health Care
7%

Regional Mall
6%

Diversified
4%

Hotel
4%

Industrial
4%

Manufactured Home
3%

Self Storage
3%

Shopping Center
3%

Specialty
3%

Corporate Bonds
2%

Free Standing
2%

Single Family Homes
2%

Cash
1%

Infrastructure
1%






	Portfolio weights are subject to change without notice. Due to rounding, values might not add up to 100%



Geographic DiversificationJune 30, 2017




Geographic Region
Percent




Pacific
28%


South Atlantic
22%


Southwest Central
14%


Mid Atlantic
11%


Northeast Central
10%


New England
5%


Mountain
4%


Northwest Central
3%


Southeast Central
3%






	Portfolio weights are subject to change without notice. Due to rounding, values might not add up to 100%







Characteristics (Click to expand)




Symbol




RFI





Total Net Assets

$352.9 Million
(At 6/30/17)



Common Assets Expense Ratio

0.85%



No. of holdings

115



NAV per share

$13.54



Distribution Rate

7.53%



SEC Yield

1.90%



Monthly Distribution Per Share

$0.08



Inception Date

9/27/93







Distribution Information




Pay Date
Record Date
Ex-DividendDate
Type
Class   
Amount/Share




7/31/2017
7/20/2017
7/18/2017
Regular
--
$0.08


6/30/2017
6/22/2017
6/20/2017
Regular
--
$0.08


5/31/2017
5/18/2017
5/16/2017
Regular
--
$0.08


4/28/2017
4/20/2017
4/18/2017
Regular
--
$0.08


3/31/2017
3/23/2017
3/21/2017
Regular
--
$0.08


2/28/2017
2/16/2017
2/14/2017
Regular
--
$0.08


1/31/2017
1/19/2017
1/17/2017
Regular
--
$0.08


12/30/2016
12/13/2016
12/9/2016
Regular
--
$0.08


11/30/2016
11/18/2016
11/16/2016
Regular
--
$0.08


10/31/2016
10/20/2016
10/18/2016
Regular
--
$0.08


9/30/2016
9/22/2016
9/20/2016
Regular
--
$0.24


6/30/2016
6/22/2016
6/20/2016
Regular
--
$0.24


3/31/2016
3/22/2016
3/18/2016
Regular
--
$0.24


12/31/2015
12/21/2015
12/17/2015
Special
--
$0.145





Regular
--
$0.24


9/30/2015
9/22/2015
9/18/2015
Special
--
$0.2





Regular
--
$0.24


6/30/2015
6/22/2015
6/18/2015
Regular
--
$0.24


3/31/2015
3/20/2015
3/18/2015
Regular
--
$0.24


12/31/2014
12/23/2014
12/19/2014
Long Term
--
$0.23





Regular
--
$0.24


9/30/2014
9/19/2014
9/17/2014
Regular
--
$0.2400


6/4/2014
5/27/2014
5/22/2014
Long Term
--
$0.1500





Regular
--
$0.2200


3/31/2014
3/21/2014
3/19/2014
Regular
--
$0.2200


12/31/2013
12/23/2013
12/19/2013
Regular
--
$0.22





Long Term
--
$0.267


9/30/2013
9/23/2013
9/19/2013
Regular
--
$0.22


6/28/2013
6/20/2013
6/18/2013
Regular
--
$0.22


3/28/2013
3/20/2013
3/18/2013
Regular
--
$0.22


12/31/2012
12/21/2012
12/19/2012
Long Term
--
$0.2622





Short Term
--
$0.2698





Regular
--
$0.22


9/28/2012
9/20/2012
9/18/2012
Regular
--
$0.22


6/29/2012
6/21/2012
6/19/2012
Regular
--
$0.22


3/30/2012
3/19/2012
3/15/2012
Regular
--
$0.22


12/30/2011
12/23/2011
12/21/2011
Regular
--
$0.22


9/30/2011
9/22/2011
9/20/2011
Regular
--
$0.22


6/30/2011
6/23/2011
8/21/2012
Regular
--
$0.22








Estimated Sources of Distribution




Pay Date
Per Share Distribution
Net Investment Income
Return Of Capital
Long Term Gain Short Term Gain 



7/31/2017
$0.08
$0
$0.0188
$0.0612 $0 

6/30/2017
$0.08
$0.0529
$0
$0.0271 $0 

5/31/2017
$0.08
$0.0149
$0.0191
$0.046 $0 

4/28/2017
$0.08
$0.0086
$0.0277
$0.0437 $0 

3/31/2017
$0.08
$0.0377
$0
$0.0423 $0 

2/28/2017
$0.08
$0.0222
$0.0007
$0.0553 $0.0018 

1/31/2017
$0.08
$0
$0
$0.08 $0 

12/30/2016
$0.08
$0.052
$0
$0.028 $0 

11/30/2016
$0.08
$0.0213
$0
$0.0168 $0.0419 

10/31/2016
$0.08
$0.0071
$0
$0.0729 $0 

9/30/2016
$0.24
$0.0775
$0
$0.1625 $0 

6/30/2016
$0.24
$0.0763
$0
$0.1637 $0 

3/31/2016
$0.24
$0.068
$0
$0.172 $0 

12/31/2015
$0.145
$0.0447
$0
$0.1003 $0 


$0.24
$0.24
$0
$0 $0 

9/30/2015
$0.2
$0
$0
$0.2 $0 


$0.24
$0.0252
$0
$0.0779 $0.1369 

6/30/2015
$0.24
$0
$0
$0.24 $0 

3/31/2015
$0.24
$0
$0
$0.24 $0 

12/31/2014
$0.23
$
$0
$0.23 $0 


$0.24
$0.0719
$0
$0.1054 $0.0627 

9/30/2014
$0.2400
$0.0534
$0
$0.1023 $0.0843 

6/4/2014
$0.1500
$
$0
$0.1500 $0 


$0.2200
$0.0783
$0
$0.1354 $0.0063 

3/31/2014
$0.2200
$0.0592
$0
$0.1608 $0 

12/31/2013
$0.22
$0.0953
$0.00
$0.1247 $0.00 


$0.267
$0.00
$0.00
$0.267 $0.00 

9/30/2013
$0.22
$0.0621
$0.00
$0.1579 $0.00 

6/28/2013
$0.22
$0.0721
$0.00
$0.1479 $0.00 

3/28/2013
$0.22
$0.0623
$0.00
$0.1577 $0.00 

12/31/2012
$0.2622
$0.00
$0.00
$0.26 $0.00 


$0.2698
$0.00
$0.00
$0.00 $0.27 


$0.22
$0.22
$0.00
$0.00 $0.00 

9/28/2012
$0.22
$0.06
$0.00
$0.16 $0.00 

6/29/2012
$0.22
$0.08
$0.00
$0.14 $0.00 

3/30/2012
$0.22
$0.06
$0.00
$0.16 $0.00 

12/30/2011
$0.22
$0.07
$0.00
$0.15 $0.00 

9/30/2011
$0.22
$0.06
$0.16
$0.00 $0.00 

6/30/2011
$0.22
$0.04
$0.18
$0.00 $0.00 




Estimates Only - Do Not Use for Tax Reporting Purposes
This table provides estimates of the Fund's distribution sources at the time of payment and should not be relied upon or used for tax planning or tax reporting purposes.
Cohen & Steers Total Return Realty Fund, Inc. (NYSE: RFI) (the “Fund”), acting in accordance with an exemptive order received from the Securities and Exchange Commission and with approval of its Board of Directors, adopted a managed distribution policy under which the Fund intends to include long-term capital gains, where applicable, as part of the regular quarterly cash distributions to its shareholders.  This policy will give the Fund greater flexibility to realize long-term capital gains and to distribute those gains on a regular quarterly basis. 
The source of all distributions paid by the Fund, including net investment income, is subject to change. This is because the Fund invests primarily in real estate investment trusts (REITs) and similar companies. Distributions from REITs are attributed to various sources, including net investment income, capital gains and return of capital. The estimates shown above are based on the prior year breakdown of distributions from the REIT securities held by the Fund. Until the Fund receives a final determination from these companies as to the source of distributions – generally around January 31 of the following year – the Fund cannot provide a final determination of the source of distributions paid. This Fund has a managed distribution policy that seeks to deliver the Fund’s long term total return potential through regular quarterly distributions declared at a fixed rate per share. Distributions may be paid in part or in full from net investment income, realized capital gains and by returning capital, or a combination thereof. Shareholders should note, however, that if the Fund’s aggregate net investment income and net realized capital gains are less than the amount of the distribution level, the difference will be distributed from the Fund’s assets and will constitute a return of the shareholder’s capital. A return of capital is not taxable; rather it reduces a shareholder’s tax basis in his or her shares of the Fund. The Board of Directors of the Fund may amend, terminate or suspend the managed distribution policy at any time, which could have an adverse effect on the market price of the Fund’s shares. 
Shareholders should not use the information provided in preparing their tax returns. Shareholders will receive a Form 1099-DIV for the calendar year indicating how to report fund distributions for federal income tax purposes.




Important Information
NOT FDIC INSURED • MAY LOSE VALUE • NO BANK GUARANTEE
Expense ratios as disclosed in the Fund’s most recent annual report to stockholders dated December 31, 2016. Expense ratios are net of waivers and/or reimbursements.
Portfolio holdings are subject to change without notice. The mention of specific securities is not a recommendation or solicitation for any person to buy, sell or hold any particular security.   Top ten holdings are determined on the basis of the value of individual securities held. The Fund may also hold positions in other types of securities issued by the companies listed above. You can obtain a complete listing of holdings by clicking here.
NAV per share is as of the prior day’s market close of regular trading on the NYSE, generally 4:00 p.m. Eastern time, on each day the NYSE is open for trading.
Distribution Rate is calculated dividing the last distribution paid per share (annualized) by the market price. Note that the number of income distributions is based on the fund’s distribution payment frequency (i.e. monthly or quarterly). A fund may pay distributions in excess of its net investment company taxable income and, to the extent this occurs, the distribution yield quoted will include a return of capital. The estimated return of capital for each distribution is also available on this Web site by clicking on the Distributions tab on each fund’s landing page.
SEC yield is calculated by dividing annualized net investment income per share during a 30-day period by the maximum offering price per share as of the close of that period. SEC yield reflects the rate at which the fund is earning income on its current portfolio of securities. Since certain distributions received by the funds from real estate investment trusts (REITs) may consist of dividend income, return of capital and capital gains, and the character of these distributions cannot be determined until after the end of the year, the SEC yield has been adjusted for the funds that invest significantly in REITs based on estimates of return of capital and capital gains.
Quarterly distribution per share is as of the most recent quarter  end. The fund pays regular quarterly cash distributions to common shareholders at a level rate that may be adjusted from time to time, based on the projected income of the fund. The amount of quarterly distributions may vary depending on a number of factors, including changes in portfolio and market conditions. Each fund’s distributions reflect net investment income, and may also include net realized capital gains and/or return of capital. Return of capital includes distributions paid by a fund in excess of its net investment income and such excess is distributed from the fund’s assets. Under federal tax regulations, some or all of the return of capital distributed by a fund may be taxed as ordinary income.
Cohen & Steers Total Return Realty Fund, Inc. (NYSE: RFI) (the “Fund”), acting in accordance with an exemptive order received from the Securities and Exchange Commission and with approval of its Board of Directors, adopted a managed distribution policy under which the Fund intends to include long-term capital gains, where applicable, as part of the regular quarterly cash distributions to its shareholders.  This policy will give the Fund greater flexibility to realize long-term capital gains and to distribute those gains on a regular quarterly basis. 
The source of all distributions paid by the Fund, including net investment income, is subject to change. This is because the Fund invests primarily in real estate investment trusts (REITs) and similar companies. Distributions from REITs are attributed to various sources, including net investment income, capital gains and return of capital. The estimates shown above are based on the prior year breakdown of distributions from the REIT securities held by the Fund. Until the Fund receives a final determination from these companies as to the source of distributions – generally around January 31 of the following year – the Fund cannot provide a final determination of the source of distributions paid. This Fund has a managed distribution policy that seeks to deliver the Fund’s long term total return potential through regular quarterly distributions declared at a fixed rate per share. Distributions may be paid in part or in full from net investment income, realized capital gains and by returning capital, or a combination thereof. Shareholders should note, however, that if the Fund’s aggregate net investment income and net realized capital gains are less than the amount of the distribution level, the difference will be distributed from the Fund’s assets and will constitute a return of the shareholder’s capital. A return of capital is not taxable; rather it reduces a shareholder’s tax basis in his or her shares of the Fund. The Board of Directors of the Fund may amend, terminate or suspend the managed distribution policy at any time, which could have an adverse effect on the market price of the Fund’s shares. 
Distributions for funds investing in real estate investment trusts (REITs) may later be characterized as capital gains and/or a return of capital, depending on the character of the dividends reported to each fund after year-end by REITs held by a fund.
However, please note that distributions are subject to recharacterization for tax purposes and the final tax treatment of these distributions will be reported to shareholders after the close of each fiscal year on form 1099-DIV.
Risks of Investing in Real Estate Securities
Risks of investing in real estate securities are similar to those associated with direct investments in real estate, including falling property values due to increasing vacancies or declining rents resulting from economic, legal, political or technological developments, lack of liquidity, limited diversification and sensitivity to certain economic factors such as interest rate changes and market recessions. Foreign securities involve special risks, including currency fluctuations, lower liquidity, political and economic uncertainties, and differences in accounting standards. Some international securities may represent small- and medium-sized companies, which may be more susceptible to price volatility and less liquidity than larger companies.
Risks of Investing in Closed-End Funds
Risks associated with investing in closed-end end funds generally include market risk, leverage risk, risk of anti-takeover provisions and non-diversification. In addition, shares of many closed-end funds frequently trade at a discount from their net asset value.




PrintEmailFor questions, call800 330 7348 LiteratureFact SheetDownloadOrder Print MaterialsComplete Holdings Download Annual ReportDownloadOrder Print MaterialsSemi-Annual ReportDownloadOrder Print MaterialsProspectus Download Section 19 NoticeDownload 








Funds
Fund Performance
Fund Literature


Insights
View All Insights
Commentaries
Education
Videos & Webcasts


Company
About Us
Our People
News Articles
Press Releases
Careers
Sitemap


Connect with us
LinkedIn
YouTube










Copyright © Cohen & Steers, Inc. 2017. All rights reserved.








Welcome
Select Audience Type:

Cohen & Steers is a global investment manager specializing in liquid real assets, including real estate securities, listed infrastructure, commodities and natural resource equities, as well as preferred securities and other income solutions.



Financial Professional


U.S.
Outside the U.S.


							 
							
						





Institution/ Consultant


U.S.
Outside the U.S.


							 
							
						





Individual Investor


U.S.
Outside the U.S.

 




By choosing this option, you acknowledge that you will be shown information on Cohen & Steers funds offered outside the United States. The information is intended only for use by institutional and professional investors outside the United States and their advisors. This information is not intended for retail investors in jurisdictions in which these funds are not authorized for distribution or in which the dissemination of information regarding the funds is not permitted.
You also acknowledge that you will be shown information on Cohen & Steers funds offered inside the United States. These funds have not been authorized for distribution in any country outside the United States and are not available for purchase by non-US persons, who may experience adverse tax consequences as a result of such investment.

CancelAgree










































RFI Stock Price - Cohen & Steers Total Return Realty Fund Inc. Stock Quote (U.S.: NYSE) - MarketWatch



























 














































 















Sections

Watchlist




























Signup
 • 
Login

Search







Bulletin











US
Europe
Asia
FX
Rates
Futures


Range


1D
5D
1M
3M
6M
1Y
2Y











Dow

21,759.95


48.94


0.23%











S&P 500

2,478.99


1.16


0.05%











Nasdaq

6,423.38


0.63


0.01%











GlobalDow

2,851.93


2.40


0.08%











Gold

1,263.10


7.50


0.60%











Oil

49.11


0.36


0.74%

















S&P 500 Movers(%)



ADP 
10.6




TSCO 
7.6




KIM 
6.8




VZ 
6.8






CA
-8.7




JCI
-8.0




FFIV
-7.4




WHR
-7.4














Latest NewsAll Times Eastern








12:47p

Updated
These cash-strapped couples want total strangers to pay for their weddings



12:47p

Updated
Bottled water is more popular than Pepsi and Coke — why you should avoid all three



12:46p

Updated
Jared Kushner’s unorthodox approach to meetings is a cautionary tale for workers everywhere



12:46p

Shares of Automatic Data Processing Inc. jump 10% in afternoon trade 



12:46p

Dow industrials up 49 points, or 0.2%, at 21,760



12:45p

S&P 500 struggles to hold onto gains, up a fraction of a point



12:44p

Updated
Trump puts his hands together for ‘the late, great Abraham Lincoln’



12:44p

Breaking
Nasdaq slips into negative territory, down 5 points at 6,417



12:43p

Updated
Facebook joins exclusive $500 billion club one day after Amazon hits the mark



12:42p

Shares of the New York Times up more than 6% following company's Q2 earnings report












to be replaced

























































































































    




Home


Investing


Quotes


Stocks


United States


RFI


Overview



Compare Quotes
Stock Screener
Earnings Calendar
Sectors
NYSE

 



RFI
U.S.: NYSE


Join TD Ameritrade

Find a Broker


Cohen & Steers Total Return Realty Fund Inc.

Watchlist 
CreateRFIAlert



  


Open

Last Updated: Jul 27, 2017 12:43 p.m. EDT
Real time quote



$
12.743



-0.007
-0.05%






Previous Close




$12.7500





  









Advanced Charting


1D
5D
1M
3M
6M
YTD
1Y
3Y
All




$
%
Vol


Advanced Charting

  




45.11% vs Avg.




                Volume:               
                
                    36.8K
                


                65 Day Avg. - 81.7K
            





Open: 12.75
Last: 12.743



12.6600
Day Low/High
12.7700





Day Range



11.6300
52 Week Low/High
14.2600


   








Your Watchlist



Customize MarketWatch
Have Watchlists? Log in to see them here or sign up to get started.

Create Account

                    … or Log In

















Symbol
Last
Chg
Chg %

















No Items in Watchlist
There are currently no items in this Watchlist.

Add Ticker to Watchlist




 (Go to Your Watchlist) 




No Saved Watchlists
Create a list of the investments you want to track.

Create Watchlist

                    …or try this starter list






Uh oh
Something went wrong while loading Watchlist.

Go to Watchlist



 

Recently Viewed Tickers



No Recent Tickers
Visit a quote page and your recently viewed tickers will be displayed here.

Search Tickers



















   





Overview


Profile


News


Charts


Financials


Historical Quotes


Analyst Estimates


Options


SEC Filings


Insiders



   




Key Data



Open
$12.75



Day Range
12.6600 - 12.7700



52 Week Range
11.6300 - 14.2600



Market Cap
n/a



Shares Outstanding
26.14M



Public Float
n/a



Beta
0.61



Rev. per Employee
n/a



P/E Ratio
n/a



EPS
n/a



Yield
7.52%



Dividend
$0.08



Ex-Dividend Date
Sep 20, 2017



Short Interest
3.21K
07/14/17


% of Float Shorted
n/a



Average Volume
81.67K




 


Performance




5 Day


0.10%







1 Month


1.22%







3 Month


-0.37%







YTD


5.31%







1 Year


-10.26%









  

 
 


Recent News



MarketWatch
Other Dow Jones










Dow set for another run at 17,000 as Fed minutes come into play


Jul. 9, 2014 at 6:31 a.m. ET
by Shawn Langlois













11 REIT Plays for Income and Inflation Protection


Jan. 21, 2017 at 12:34 a.m. ET
on Barron's









Pimco Trims Position as TIPS Set to Dip


May. 11, 2009 at 2:26 p.m. ET
on The Wall Street Journal









Fund Facts to Turn Brief, User-Friendly


Nov. 19, 2008 at 9:59 p.m. ET
on The Wall Street Journal









Pimco Shifts Its Tilt Toward TIPS


Oct. 29, 2008 at 12:01 a.m. ET
on The Wall Street Journal














Recent News



Other News
Press Releases






Multimedia Weekly Digest: Economic Data
Multimedia Weekly Digest: Economic Data

Jul. 27, 2017 at 9:30 a.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Busy Week For Housing Economic Data 7-26-2017 (Video)
Busy Week For Housing Economic Data 7-26-2017 (Video)

Jul. 27, 2017 at 3:08 a.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





The Truth Behind The Housing Market
The Truth Behind The Housing Market

Jul. 25, 2017 at 2:38 p.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Value And Income: It's A Matter Of Taste
Value And Income: It's A Matter Of Taste

Jul. 22, 2017 at 7:30 a.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Housing And Real Estate News 7-19-2017 (Video)
Housing And Real Estate News 7-19-2017 (Video)

Jul. 20, 2017 at 12:58 a.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Why I'm Selling My CEFL Position
Why I'm Selling My CEFL Position

Jul. 19, 2017 at 10:30 a.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





The 8% Income Portfolio: Second-Quarter 2017 Review.
The 8% Income Portfolio: Second-Quarter 2017 Review.

Jul. 17, 2017 at 1:24 p.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Housing And Real Estate News 7-8-2017 (Video)
Housing And Real Estate News 7-8-2017 (Video)

Jul. 9, 2017 at 8:17 a.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Strong H1 for mortgage REITs; broader REIT sector underperforms
Strong H1 for mortgage REITs; broader REIT sector underperforms

Jul. 7, 2017 at 4:06 p.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Mall Tour 2017 (Part II)
Mall Tour 2017 (Part II)

Jul. 6, 2017 at 2:13 p.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





High-Income, Sustainable Capital Portfolio: Second Quarter 2017
High-Income, Sustainable Capital Portfolio: Second Quarter 2017

Jul. 5, 2017 at 2:34 p.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Real Estate Prices Relative To Geography In The United States (Video)
Real Estate Prices Relative To Geography In The United States (Video)

Jul. 4, 2017 at 2:11 p.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Real Estate Investment News (Video)
Real Estate Investment News (Video)

Jul. 3, 2017 at 5:49 a.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Mall Tour 2017
Mall Tour 2017

Jun. 28, 2017 at 2:23 a.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





New Home Sales Confirm Slowdown - But Not Negative
New Home Sales Confirm Slowdown - But Not Negative

Jun. 23, 2017 at 2:56 p.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Amazon's Whole Foods Buy Could Transform Retail CRE
Amazon's Whole Foods Buy Could Transform Retail CRE

Jun. 22, 2017 at 11:04 p.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Retail Real Estate In The U.S. - Survival Of The Fittest
Retail Real Estate In The U.S. - Survival Of The Fittest

Jun. 22, 2017 at 4:48 a.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





A Further Look At The Housing Slowdown
A Further Look At The Housing Slowdown

Jun. 21, 2017 at 11:19 a.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





The Triumphant Rise Of 3D Printing: Good News For Commercial Property?
The Triumphant Rise Of 3D Printing: Good News For Commercial Property?

Jun. 20, 2017 at 3:59 a.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Housing In America: Movin' On Up
Housing In America: Movin' On Up

Jun. 14, 2017 at 10:27 p.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha









Cohen & Steers Total Return Realty Fund, Inc. (RFI) Notification of Sources of Distribution Under Section 19(a)
Cohen & Steers Total Return Realty Fund, Inc. (RFI) Notification of Sources of Distribution Under Section 19(a)

Jul. 24, 2017 at 5:56 p.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





Cohen & Steers Funds Quarterly Data Now Available
Cohen & Steers Funds Quarterly Data Now Available

Jul. 24, 2017 at 5:17 p.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





Cohen & Steers Closed-End Funds Declare Distributions for July, August and September 2017
Cohen & Steers Closed-End Funds Declare Distributions for July, August and September 2017

Jun. 28, 2017 at 6:26 p.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





Cohen & Steers Total Return Realty Fund, Inc. (RFI) Notification of Sources of Distribution Under Section 19(a)
Cohen & Steers Total Return Realty Fund, Inc. (RFI) Notification of Sources of Distribution Under Section 19(a)

Jun. 23, 2017 at 5:38 p.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





Cohen & Steers Total Return Realty Fund, Inc. (RFI) Notification of Sources of Distribution Under Section 19(a)
Cohen & Steers Total Return Realty Fund, Inc. (RFI) Notification of Sources of Distribution Under Section 19(a)

May. 22, 2017 at 6:32 p.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





Cohen & Steers Total Return Realty Fund, Inc. (RFI) Notification of Sources of Distribution Under Section 19(a)


Apr. 24, 2017 at 7:18 p.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





Cohen & Steers Closed-End Funds Declare Distributions for April, May and June 2017


Mar. 28, 2017 at 5:46 p.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





Cohen & Steers Total Return Realty Fund, Inc. (RFI) Notification of Sources of Distribution Under Section 19(a)


Mar. 24, 2017 at 5:08 p.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





Cohen & Steers Total Return Realty Fund, Inc. (RFI) Notification of Sources of Distribution Under Section 19(a)


Feb. 21, 2017 at 5:47 p.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





Cohen & Steers Funds Quarterly Data Now Available


Jan. 27, 2017 at 5:00 p.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





Cohen & Steers Total Return Realty Fund, Inc. (RFI) Notification of Sources of Distribution Under Section 19(a)


Jan. 23, 2017 at 5:32 p.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





Cohen & Steers Total Return Realty Fund, Inc. (RFI) Notification of Sources of Distribution Under Section 19(a)


Dec. 22, 2016 at 5:05 p.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





Cohen & Steers Closed-End Funds Declare Distributions for January, February and March 2017


Dec. 21, 2016 at 5:21 p.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





Cohen & Steers Total Return Realty Fund, Inc. (RFI) Notification of Sources of Distribution Under Section 19(a)


Nov. 23, 2016 at 4:55 p.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





Cohen & Steers Total Return Realty Fund, Inc. (RFI) Notification of Sources of Distribution Under Section 19(a)


Oct. 25, 2016 at 5:42 p.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





Cohen & Steers Funds Quarterly Data Now Available


Oct. 24, 2016 at 6:03 p.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





Cohen & Steers Total Return Realty Fund, Inc. (RFI) Adopts Monthly Distribution Policy and Declares Distributions for October, November and December 2016


Sep. 15, 2016 at 6:23 p.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





Cohen & Steers Total Return Realty Fund, Inc. (RFI) Declares September 2016 Quarterly Distribution


Sep. 8, 2016 at 6:23 p.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





Cohen & Steers Total Return Realty Fund, Inc. (RFI) Declares September 2016 Quarterly Distribution


Sep. 8, 2016 at 6:23 p.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF








  



 
   






   



























Partner Content























Trending Tickers
Powered by 





FB

3.47%








AMZN

0.80%








AMD

-3.69%








CLF

-9.44%








TWTR

-13.70%
























Advanced Search







Stocks



Columns


Authors


Topics







No results found





























Video Center










Learn more.Storyful, a division of News Corp, which owns MarketWatch, is a leading social media services company headquartered in Dublin, Ireland. Storyful combines world class journalism with industry-leading technology to discover, verify and acquire original content and provide the on-the-ground sources news and media organizations need to tell the stories that matter to their audience.













Stocks Index - Markets Index
























Bulletin






Investor Alert







New York Markets Close in:



Market Snapshot
Winners and Losers
















Stocks
Rates
Funds
Bonds
Benchmarks
Real Estate Investment Trusts
Futures
American Depository Receipt Stocks
Exchange Traded Notes
Warrants
Indexes
Exchange Traded Funds
Currencies
Crypto Currencies

Browse Stocks
Stocks A-Z


0-9ABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZOther

Browse by Location

Argentina
Australia
Austria
Bahamas
Bahrain
Belgium
Bermuda
Botswana
Brazil
British Virgin Islands
Canada
Cayman Islands
Chile
China
Colombia
Curacao
Cyprus
Czech Republic
Denmark
Egypt
Estonia
Finland
France
Germany
Gibraltar
Greece
Hong Kong
Hungary
Iceland
India
Indonesia
Ireland
Isle of Man
Israel
Italy
Japan
Jordan
Kazakhstan
Kuwait
Latvia
Lebanon
Liechtenstein
Lithuania
Luxembourg
Malaysia
Malta
Mauritius
Mexico
Monaco
Money Rates
Morocco
Namibia
Netherlands
New Zealand
Norway
Oman
Pakistan
Panama
Peru
Philippines
Poland
Portugal
Qatar
Romania
Russia
Saudi Arabia
Singapore
Slovakia
Slovenia
South Africa
South Korea
Spain
Sri Lanka
Sweden
Switzerland
Taiwan
Thailand
Tunisia
Turkey
Ukraine
United Arab Emirates
United States
Venezuela
Western Samoa












Log In




12:48 PM EDT
July 27, 2017


/marketstate/country/us
New York

	Open


/marketstate/country/uk
London

	Closed


/marketstate/country/jp
Tokyo

	Closed





/marketstate/country/us
 


/marketstate/country/uk
 


/marketstate/country/jp
 











View All



Latest News

/news/latest
12:48pThese cash-strapped couples want total strangers to pay for their weddings
12:47pBottled water is more popular than Pepsi and Coke — why you should avoid all three
12:47pJared Kushner’s unorthodox approach to meetings is a cautionary tale for workers everywhere
12:46pShares of Automatic Data Processing Inc. jump 10% in afternoon trade 
12:46pDow industrials up 49 points, or 0.2%, at 21,760
12:46pS&P 500 struggles to hold onto gains, up a fraction of a point
12:45pTrump puts his hands together for ‘the late, great Abraham Lincoln’
12:44pBREAKINGNasdaq slips into negative territory, down 5 points at 6,417
12:43pFacebook joins exclusive $500 billion club one day after Amazon hits the mark
12:42pShares of the New York Times up more than 6% following company's Q2 earnings report
12:42pYour SoulCycle obsession may soon be replaced by Planet Fitness
12:40pShares of Netflix are down more than 2%
12:39pStarbucks earnings: Well-positioned for global growth, but same-store sales a concern
12:38pAll the companies in Jeff Bezos’s empire, in one (large) chart
12:35pFTSE 100 closes lower as AstraZeneca plunges; Diageo shares surge 
12:35pAmazon earnings: Analysts recognize its dominant position in the U.S., look abroad
12:35pWaters has testy exchange with Mnuchin over Trump financing
12:30pKering profit boosted by Gucci sales
12:29pHollywood fighting Netflix is like yelling at an oncoming tsunami
12:29pNew rule forces big car makers into big changes in how they count revenues
Loading more headlines...




dow

/quotes/zigman/627449/realtime
21,759.86

+48.85
+0.23%





nasdaq

/quotes/zigman/12633936/realtime
6,423.08

+0.34
+0.01%





s&p 500

/quotes/zigman/3870025/realtime
2,478.97

+1.14
+0.05%













Kiosk


1352872800000
1352872800000


The RetireMentors






				Retirement advice from our industry experts
				Our team of financial professionals can help you plan and save 
					for retirement, then 
				live well in it.



/conga/kiosk/retirementors.html
361307




1320411600000
1320616500000


Alerts



/conga/kiosk/alerts.html
310238




1333717800000
1333964100000


Virtual Stock Exchange





Our free stock-market game
				• Trade your virtual portfolio in real time
				• Talk strategies in group discussions
				• Find or create a game that suits you
				• Use our learning center to improve 



/conga/kiosk/games.html
310284




1245657600000
1277280000000


Location Scouts




Housing-market insights from our realty pros
																																																							Plus the latest data from Realtor.com on 21 home markets across the U.S.
• See our complete Real Estate site


/conga/kiosk/real_estate.html
357012




1404799200000
1404799200000


Lazy Portfolios





				Set it and forget it
				Check out the returns on our 8 Lazy Portfolios that are made up 
				of low-cost 
				buy-and-hold index funds.

				• How to create your own Lazy Portfolio


/conga/kiosk/lazy_portfolio.html
313134














MarketWatch.com




Site Index
Topics
Help
Feedback
Newsroom Roster

                    Media Archive
Premium Products
Mobile


Company Info
Code of Conduct
Corrections
Advertising Media Kit
Advertise Locally
Reprints & Licensing
Broker Center

                    Your Ad Choices


Follow MarketWatch


































RSS
Podcasts






WSJ.com
Barron's Online
BigCharts
Virtual Stock Exchange


Financial News London
WSJ.com Small Business
realtor.com
Mansion Global












		Copyright © 2017 MarketWatch, Inc.  All rights reserved.
		By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Service,
        Privacy Policy and Cookie Policy.
	



            Intraday Data provided by SIX Financial Information and subject to terms of use. Historical and current end-of-day data provided by SIX Financial Information. All quotes are in local exchange time. Real-time last sale data for U.S. stock quotes reflect trades reported through Nasdaq only. Intraday data delayed at least 15 minutes or per exchange requirements.
        






MarketWatch Top Stories
Link to MarketWatch's Slice.

15



















































Stocks Index - Markets Index
























Bulletin






Investor Alert







New York Markets Close in:



Market Snapshot
Winners and Losers
















Stocks
Rates
Funds
Bonds
Benchmarks
Real Estate Investment Trusts
Futures
American Depository Receipt Stocks
Exchange Traded Notes
Warrants
Indexes
Exchange Traded Funds
Currencies
Crypto Currencies

Browse Stocks
Stocks A-Z


0-9ABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZOther

Browse by Location

Argentina
Australia
Austria
Bahamas
Bahrain
Belgium
Bermuda
Botswana
Brazil
British Virgin Islands
Canada
Cayman Islands
Chile
China
Colombia
Curacao
Cyprus
Czech Republic
Denmark
Egypt
Estonia
Finland
France
Germany
Gibraltar
Greece
Hong Kong
Hungary
Iceland
India
Indonesia
Ireland
Isle of Man
Israel
Italy
Japan
Jordan
Kazakhstan
Kuwait
Latvia
Lebanon
Liechtenstein
Lithuania
Luxembourg
Malaysia
Malta
Mauritius
Mexico
Monaco
Money Rates
Morocco
Namibia
Netherlands
New Zealand
Norway
Oman
Pakistan
Panama
Peru
Philippines
Poland
Portugal
Qatar
Romania
Russia
Saudi Arabia
Singapore
Slovakia
Slovenia
South Africa
South Korea
Spain
Sri Lanka
Sweden
Switzerland
Taiwan
Thailand
Tunisia
Turkey
Ukraine
United Arab Emirates
United States
Venezuela
Western Samoa












Log In




12:48 PM EDT
July 27, 2017


/marketstate/country/us
New York

	Open


/marketstate/country/uk
London

	Closed


/marketstate/country/jp
Tokyo

	Closed





/marketstate/country/us
 


/marketstate/country/uk
 


/marketstate/country/jp
 











View All



Latest News

/news/latest
12:48pThese cash-strapped couples want total strangers to pay for their weddings
12:47pBottled water is more popular than Pepsi and Coke — why you should avoid all three
12:47pJared Kushner’s unorthodox approach to meetings is a cautionary tale for workers everywhere
12:46pShares of Automatic Data Processing Inc. jump 10% in afternoon trade 
12:46pDow industrials up 49 points, or 0.2%, at 21,760
12:46pS&P 500 struggles to hold onto gains, up a fraction of a point
12:45pTrump puts his hands together for ‘the late, great Abraham Lincoln’
12:44pBREAKINGNasdaq slips into negative territory, down 5 points at 6,417
12:43pFacebook joins exclusive $500 billion club one day after Amazon hits the mark
12:42pShares of the New York Times up more than 6% following company's Q2 earnings report
12:42pYour SoulCycle obsession may soon be replaced by Planet Fitness
12:40pShares of Netflix are down more than 2%
12:39pStarbucks earnings: Well-positioned for global growth, but same-store sales a concern
12:38pAll the companies in Jeff Bezos’s empire, in one (large) chart
12:35pFTSE 100 closes lower as AstraZeneca plunges; Diageo shares surge 
12:35pAmazon earnings: Analysts recognize its dominant position in the U.S., look abroad
12:35pWaters has testy exchange with Mnuchin over Trump financing
12:30pKering profit boosted by Gucci sales
12:29pHollywood fighting Netflix is like yelling at an oncoming tsunami
12:29pNew rule forces big car makers into big changes in how they count revenues
Loading more headlines...




dow

/quotes/zigman/627449/realtime
21,759.86

+48.85
+0.23%





nasdaq

/quotes/zigman/12633936/realtime
6,423.08

+0.34
+0.01%





s&p 500

/quotes/zigman/3870025/realtime
2,478.97

+1.14
+0.05%













Kiosk


1352872800000
1352872800000


The RetireMentors






				Retirement advice from our industry experts
				Our team of financial professionals can help you plan and save 
					for retirement, then 
				live well in it.



/conga/kiosk/retirementors.html
361307




1320411600000
1320616500000


Alerts



/conga/kiosk/alerts.html
310238




1333717800000
1333964100000


Virtual Stock Exchange





Our free stock-market game
				• Trade your virtual portfolio in real time
				• Talk strategies in group discussions
				• Find or create a game that suits you
				• Use our learning center to improve 



/conga/kiosk/games.html
310284




1245657600000
1277280000000


Location Scouts




Housing-market insights from our realty pros
																																																							Plus the latest data from Realtor.com on 21 home markets across the U.S.
• See our complete Real Estate site


/conga/kiosk/real_estate.html
357012




1404799200000
1404799200000


Lazy Portfolios





				Set it and forget it
				Check out the returns on our 8 Lazy Portfolios that are made up 
				of low-cost 
				buy-and-hold index funds.

				• How to create your own Lazy Portfolio


/conga/kiosk/lazy_portfolio.html
313134














MarketWatch.com




Site Index
Topics
Help
Feedback
Newsroom Roster

                    Media Archive
Premium Products
Mobile


Company Info
Code of Conduct
Corrections
Advertising Media Kit
Advertise Locally
Reprints & Licensing
Broker Center

                    Your Ad Choices


Follow MarketWatch


































RSS
Podcasts






WSJ.com
Barron's Online
BigCharts
Virtual Stock Exchange


Financial News London
WSJ.com Small Business
realtor.com
Mansion Global












		Copyright © 2017 MarketWatch, Inc.  All rights reserved.
		By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Service,
        Privacy Policy and Cookie Policy.
	



            Intraday Data provided by SIX Financial Information and subject to terms of use. Historical and current end-of-day data provided by SIX Financial Information. All quotes are in local exchange time. Real-time last sale data for U.S. stock quotes reflect trades reported through Nasdaq only. Intraday data delayed at least 15 minutes or per exchange requirements.
        






MarketWatch Top Stories
Link to MarketWatch's Slice.

15



















































Stocks/Country/United States Index - Markets Index
























Bulletin






Investor Alert







New York Markets Close in:



Market Snapshot
Winners and Losers
















Stocks
Rates
Funds
Bonds
Benchmarks
Real Estate Investment Trusts
Futures
American Depository Receipt Stocks
Exchange Traded Notes
Warrants
Indexes
Exchange Traded Funds
Currencies
Crypto Currencies

Location: United States



Name
Exchange
Sector




01 Communique Laboratory Inc. (OCQLF)
OOTC
Software


1347 Property Insurance Holdings Inc. (PIH)
XNAS
Non-Life Insurance


1-800-FLOWERS.COM Inc. Cl A (FLWS)
XNAS
Specialty Retail


1pm Industries Inc. (OPMZ)
OOTC
Food Products


1st Capital Bank (CA) (FISB)
OOTC
Banking


1st Constitution Bancorp (FCCY)
XNAS
Banking


1st NRG Corp. (FNRC)
OOTC
Oil Extraction


1st Source Corp. (SRCE)
XNAS
Banking


2050 Motors Inc. (ETFM)
OOTC
Automobiles


21st Century Fox Inc. Cl A (FOXA)
XNAS
Broadcasting


21st Century Fox Inc. Cl B (FOX)
XNAS
Broadcasting


21Vianet Group Inc. ADR (VNET)
XNAS
Internet/Online


22nd Century Group Inc. (XXII)
XASE
Biotechnology


24/7 Kid Doc Inc. (TVMD)
OOTC
Healthcare Provision


2U Inc. (TWOU)
XNAS
Software


2xLeveraged Long E-TRACS Linked to Wells Fargo Business Development Co. Index 052441 (BDCL)
ARCX
Major International Banks


2xLeveraged Long ETRACS Wells Fargo Business Development (LBDC)
ARCX
Major International Banks


3D Eye Solutions Inc. (TDEY)
OOTC
Motion Picture/Sound Recording


3D Pioneer Systems Inc. (DPSM)
OOTC
Software


3D Systems Corp. (DDD)
XNYS
Computers/Consumer Electronics


3DIcon Corp. (TDCP)
OOTC
Software


3Dshopping.com (THDS)
OOTC
Mixed Retailing


3DX Industries Inc. (DDDX)
OOTC
Computers/Consumer Electronics


3i Group PLC ADR (TGOPY)
OOTC
Finance Companies


3M Co. (MMM)
XNYS
Diversified Holding Companies


3Pea International Inc. (TPNL)
XOTC
Accounting


3Power Energy Group Inc. (PSPW)
OOTC
Renewable Energy Generation


3TL Technologies Corp. (TTMZF)
OOTC
Advertising/Marketing/Public Relations


420 Property Management Inc. (FTPM)
OOTC
Real Estate Agents/Brokers


4Cable TV International Inc. (CATV)
OOTC
Diversified Business Services


4Licensing Corp. (FOURQ)
OOTC
Diversified Business Services


500.com Ltd. ADR (WBAI)
XNYS
Gambling Industries


51job Inc. ADR (JOBS)
XNAS
Employment/Training Services


58.com Inc. ADR (WUBA)
XNYS
Consumer Services


5Barz International Inc. (BARZ)
OOTC
Networking


5N Plus Inc. (FPLSF)
OOTC
Commodity Chemicals


6D Global Technologies Inc. (SIXD)
OOTC
Computer Services


808 Renewable Energy Corp. (RNWR)
OOTC
Multiutilities


88 Energy Ltd. ADR (TNGRY)
OOTC
Oil Extraction


888 Holdings PLC (EIHDF)
OOTC
Gambling Industries


8Point3 Energy Partners LP (CAFD)
XNAS
Renewable Energy Generation


8X8 Inc. (EGHT)
XNAS
Wired Telecommunications Services


A Clean Slate Inc. (DRWN)
OOTC
Diversified Business Services


A&W Revenue Royalties Income Fund (AWRRF)
OOTC
Restaurants


A. H. Belo Corp. Series A (AHC)
XNYS
Publishing


A. Schulman Inc. (SHLM)
XNAS
Commodity Chemicals


A. Schulman Inc. 6% Pfd. (SLMNP)
OOTC
Commodity Chemicals


A.D. Makepeace Co. (MAKE)
OOTC
Farming


A.M. Castle & Co. (CAS)
XNYS
Wholesalers


A.O. Smith Corp. (AOS)
XNYS
Building Materials/Products


A.P. Moeller-Maersk A/S ADR (AMKBY)
OOTC
Water Transport/Shipping


A.P. Moeller-Maersk A/S Series A (AMKAF)
OOTC
Water Transport/Shipping


A.P. Moeller-Maersk A/S Series B (AMKBF)
OOTC
Water Transport/Shipping


A.S. Roma S.p.A. (ASRAF)
OOTC
Recreational Services


A-1 Group Inc. (AWON)
OOTC
Tobacco


A10 Networks Inc. (ATEN)
XNYS
Computer Services


a2 Milk Co. Ltd. (ACOPF)
OOTC
Biotechnology


AAC Holdings Inc. (AAC)
XNYS
Healthcare Provision


AAC Technologies Holdings Inc. (AACAF)
OOTC
Industrial Electronics


AAC Technologies Holdings Inc. ADR (AACAY)
OOTC
Industrial Electronics


AAON Inc. (AAON)
XNAS
Building Materials/Products


AAP Inc. (AAPJ)
OOTC
Food Products


AAR Corp. (AIR)
XNYS
Aerospace Products/Parts


Aaron's Inc. (AAN)
XNYS
Consumer Services


AB Science S.A. (ABSCF)
OOTC
Pharmaceuticals


AB Svensk Exportkredit ELEMENTS linked to MLCX Biofuels Index Total Return (FUE)
ARCX
Finance Companies


AB Svensk Exportkredit ELEMENTS linked to MLCX Grain Index Total Return (GRU)
ARCX
Finance Companies


AB&T Financial Corp. (ABTO)
OOTC
Banking


Abacus Mining & Exploration Corp. (ABCFF)
OOTC
General Mining


Abakan Inc. (ABKI)
OOTC
Industrial Products


Abattis Bioceuticals Corp. (ATTBF)
OOTC
Biotechnology


Abaxis Inc. (ABAX)
XNAS
Medical Equipment/Supplies


ABB Ltd. (ABLZF)
OOTC
Industrial Machinery


ABB Ltd. ADR (ABB)
XNYS
Industrial Machinery


Abbott Laboratories (ABT)
XNYS
Pharmaceuticals


AbbVie Inc. (ABBV)
XNYS
Biotechnology


Abby Inc. (ABBY)
OOTC
Oil Extraction


Abcam PLC (ABCZF)
OOTC
Biotechnology


Abcam PLC ADR (ABCZY)
OOTC
Biotechnology


ABCO Energy Inc. (ABCE)
OOTC
Industrial Machinery


Abcourt Mines Inc. (ABMBF)
OOTC
General Mining


Aben Resources Ltd. (ABNAF)
OOTC
General Mining


Abengoa S.A. B (AGOAF)
OOTC
Construction


Abeona Therapeutics Inc. (ABEO)
XNAS
Biotechnology


Abeona Therapeutics Inc. Wt (ABEOW)
XNAS



Abercrombie & Fitch Co. (ANF)
XNYS
Clothing Retail


Aberdeen Asia-Pacific Income Fund Inc. (FAX)
XASE
Closed-End Funds


Aberdeen Asia-Pacific Income Investment Co. Ltd. (ABAKF)
OOTC
Closed-End Funds


Aberdeen Asset Management PLC (ABDNF)
OOTC
Investment Advisors


Aberdeen Asset Management PLC ADR (ABDNY)
OOTC
Investment Advisors


Aberdeen Australia Equity Fund Inc. (IAF)
XASE
Closed-End Funds


Aberdeen Chile Fund Inc. (CH)
XASE
Closed-End Funds


Aberdeen Emerging Markets Smaller Company Opportunities Fund Inc. (ABE)
XASE
Closed-End Funds


Aberdeen Global Income Fund Inc. (FCO)
XASE
Closed-End Funds


Aberdeen Greater China Fund Inc. (GCH)
XNYS
Closed-End Funds


Aberdeen Indonesia Fund Inc. (IF)
XASE
Closed-End Funds


Aberdeen International Inc. (AABVF)
OOTC
General Mining


Aberdeen Israel Fund Inc. (ISL)
XASE
Closed-End Funds


Aberdeen Japan Equity Fund Inc. (JEQ)
XNYS
Closed-End Funds


Aberdeen Latin America Equity Fund Inc. (LAQ)
XASE
Closed-End Funds


Aberdeen Singapore Fund Inc. (SGF)
XNYS
Closed-End Funds


Abertis Infraestructuras S.A. ADR (ABRTY)
OOTC
Transportation Services


Ability Inc. (ABIL)
XNAS
Precision Products


Ability Inc. Wt (ABIWF)
OOTC



Abiomed Inc. (ABMD)
XNAS
Medical Equipment/Supplies


Abitibi Royalties Inc. (ATBYF)
OOTC
General Mining


Able Energy Inc. (ABLE)
OOTC
Gas Utilities


Ablynx N.V. (ABLYF)
OOTC
Biotechnology


ABM Industries Inc. (ABM)
XNYS
Diversified Business Services


Abraxas Petroleum Corp. (AXAS)
XNAS
Oil Extraction


Absecon Bancorp (ASCN)
OOTC
Banking


Absolute Health & Fitness Inc. (AHFI)
OOTC
Recreational Services


Absolute Software Corp. (ALSWF)
OOTC
Software


ABT Holdings Inc. (ABOT)
OOTC
Precious Metals


Abtech Holdings Inc. (ABHD)
OOTC
Industrial Machinery


ABV Consulting Inc. (ABVN)
OOTC
Advertising/Marketing/Public Relations


AC Immune S.A. (ACIU)
XNAS
Biotechnology


Acacia Communications Inc. (ACIA)
XNAS
Networking


Acacia Diversified Holdings Inc. (ACCA)
OOTC
Specialty Retail


Acacia Mining PLC (ABGLF)
OOTC
Gold


Acacia Research Corp. - Acacia Technologies (ACTG)
XNAS
Diversified Business Services


Acadia Healthcare Co. Inc. (ACHC)
XNAS
Healthcare Provision


ACADIA Pharmaceuticals Inc. (ACAD)
XNAS
Biotechnology


Acadia Realty Trust (AKR)
XNYS



Acadian Timber Corp. (ACAZF)
OOTC
Forestry & Wood Products


Acasti Pharma Inc. (ACST)
XNAS
Pharmaceuticals


Accelera Innovations Inc. (ACNV)
OOTC
Healthcare Provision


Accelerate Diagnostics Inc. (AXDX)
XNAS
Biotechnology


Accelerize Inc. (ACLZ)
XOTC
Life Insurance


Acceleron Pharma Inc. (XLRN)
XNAS
Biotechnology


Accenture PLC Cl A (ACN)
XNYS
Diversified Business Services


Access National Corp. (ANCX)
XNAS
Banking


Access Power Inc. (ACCR)
OOTC
Wired Telecommunications Services


Access Worldwide Communications Inc. (AWWC)
OOTC
Advertising/Marketing/Public Relations


Acciona S.A. (ACXIF)
OOTC
Construction


ACCO Brands Corp. (ACCO)
XNYS
Nondurable Household Products


Accor S.A. (ACRFF)
OOTC
Hotels


Accor S.A. ADR (ACCYY)
OOTC
Hotels


Accordia Golf Co. Ltd. (ACGFF)
OOTC
Recreational Services


Accredited Mortgage Loan REIT Trust 9.75% Perp. Cum. Pfd. Series A (AHHAP)
OOTC
Mortgages


Accretive Health Inc. (ACHI)
OOTC
Healthcare Provision


Accuray Inc. (ARAY)
XNAS
Medical Equipment/Supplies


Accuride Corp. (ACW)
XNYS
Auto & Commercial Vehicle Parts


AcelRx Pharmaceuticals Inc. (ACRX)
XNAS
Pharmaceuticals


Acer Inc. GDR Reg S (ACEYY)
OOTC
Computers/Consumer Electronics


Acerus Pharmaceuticals Corp. (TRLPF)
OOTC
Biotechnology


Aceto Corp. (ACET)
XNAS
Specialty Chemicals


Achaogen Inc. (AKAO)
XNAS
Biotechnology


Achillion Pharmaceuticals Inc. (ACHN)
XNAS
Biotechnology


ACI Worldwide Inc. (ACIW)
XNAS
Software



«1234567891011-2021-3031-4041-5051-6061-7071-8081-9091-94»










Log In




12:48 PM EDT
July 27, 2017


/marketstate/country/us
New York

	Open


/marketstate/country/uk
London

	Closed


/marketstate/country/jp
Tokyo

	Closed





/marketstate/country/us
 


/marketstate/country/uk
 


/marketstate/country/jp
 











View All



Latest News

/news/latest
12:48pWill having a baby bankrupt you? Use this calculator to find out 
12:48pThese cash-strapped couples want total strangers to pay for their weddings
12:47pBottled water is more popular than Pepsi and Coke — why you should avoid all three
12:47pJared Kushner’s unorthodox approach to meetings is a cautionary tale for workers everywhere
12:46pShares of Automatic Data Processing Inc. jump 10% in afternoon trade 
12:46pDow industrials up 49 points, or 0.2%, at 21,760
12:46pS&P 500 struggles to hold onto gains, up a fraction of a point
12:45pTrump puts his hands together for ‘the late, great Abraham Lincoln’
12:44pBREAKINGNasdaq slips into negative territory, down 5 points at 6,417
12:43pFacebook joins exclusive $500 billion club one day after Amazon hits the mark
12:42pShares of the New York Times up more than 6% following company's Q2 earnings report
12:42pYour SoulCycle obsession may soon be replaced by Planet Fitness
12:40pShares of Netflix are down more than 2%
12:39pStarbucks earnings: Well-positioned for global growth, but same-store sales a concern
12:38pAll the companies in Jeff Bezos’s empire, in one (large) chart
12:35pFTSE 100 closes lower as AstraZeneca plunges; Diageo shares surge 
12:35pAmazon earnings: Analysts recognize its dominant position in the U.S., look abroad
12:35pWaters has testy exchange with Mnuchin over Trump financing
12:30pKering profit boosted by Gucci sales
12:29pHollywood fighting Netflix is like yelling at an oncoming tsunami
Loading more headlines...




dow

/quotes/zigman/627449/realtime
21,759.94

+48.93
+0.23%





nasdaq

/quotes/zigman/12633936/realtime
6,423.05

+0.30
+0.00%





s&p 500

/quotes/zigman/3870025/realtime
2,479.01

+1.18
+0.05%













Kiosk


1352872800000
1352872800000


The RetireMentors






				Retirement advice from our industry experts
				Our team of financial professionals can help you plan and save 
					for retirement, then 
				live well in it.



/conga/kiosk/retirementors.html
361307




1320411600000
1320616500000


Alerts



/conga/kiosk/alerts.html
310238




1333717800000
1333964100000


Virtual Stock Exchange





Our free stock-market game
				• Trade your virtual portfolio in real time
				• Talk strategies in group discussions
				• Find or create a game that suits you
				• Use our learning center to improve 



/conga/kiosk/games.html
310284




1245657600000
1277280000000


Location Scouts




Housing-market insights from our realty pros
																																																							Plus the latest data from Realtor.com on 21 home markets across the U.S.
• See our complete Real Estate site


/conga/kiosk/real_estate.html
357012




1404799200000
1404799200000


Lazy Portfolios





				Set it and forget it
				Check out the returns on our 8 Lazy Portfolios that are made up 
				of low-cost 
				buy-and-hold index funds.

				• How to create your own Lazy Portfolio


/conga/kiosk/lazy_portfolio.html
313134














MarketWatch.com




Site Index
Topics
Help
Feedback
Newsroom Roster

                    Media Archive
Premium Products
Mobile


Company Info
Code of Conduct
Corrections
Advertising Media Kit
Advertise Locally
Reprints & Licensing
Broker Center

                    Your Ad Choices


Follow MarketWatch


































RSS
Podcasts






WSJ.com
Barron's Online
BigCharts
Virtual Stock Exchange


Financial News London
WSJ.com Small Business
realtor.com
Mansion Global












		Copyright © 2017 MarketWatch, Inc.  All rights reserved.
		By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Service,
        Privacy Policy and Cookie Policy.
	



            Intraday Data provided by SIX Financial Information and subject to terms of use. Historical and current end-of-day data provided by SIX Financial Information. All quotes are in local exchange time. Real-time last sale data for U.S. stock quotes reflect trades reported through Nasdaq only. Intraday data delayed at least 15 minutes or per exchange requirements.
        






MarketWatch Top Stories
Link to MarketWatch's Slice.

15


















































RFI Stock Price - Cohen & Steers Total Return Realty Fund Inc. Stock Quote (U.S.: NYSE) - MarketWatch



























 














































 















Sections

Watchlist




























Signup
 • 
Login

Search







Bulletin











US
Europe
Asia
FX
Rates
Futures


Range


1D
5D
1M
3M
6M
1Y
2Y











Dow

21,759.86


48.85


0.23%











S&P 500

2,478.98


1.15


0.05%











Nasdaq

6,423.08


0.34


0.01%











GlobalDow

2,851.89


2.36


0.08%











Gold

1,263.10


7.50


0.60%











Oil

49.12


0.37


0.76%

















S&P 500 Movers(%)



ADP 
11.0




TSCO 
7.7




KIM 
6.9




VZ 
6.8






CA
-8.7




JCI
-8.0




FFIV
-7.4




WHR
-7.4














Latest NewsAll Times Eastern








12:47p

Updated
These cash-strapped couples want total strangers to pay for their weddings



12:47p

Updated
Bottled water is more popular than Pepsi and Coke — why you should avoid all three



12:46p

Updated
Jared Kushner’s unorthodox approach to meetings is a cautionary tale for workers everywhere



12:46p

Shares of Automatic Data Processing Inc. jump 10% in afternoon trade 



12:46p

Dow industrials up 49 points, or 0.2%, at 21,760



12:45p

S&P 500 struggles to hold onto gains, up a fraction of a point



12:44p

Updated
Trump puts his hands together for ‘the late, great Abraham Lincoln’



12:44p

Breaking
Nasdaq slips into negative territory, down 5 points at 6,417



12:43p

Updated
Facebook joins exclusive $500 billion club one day after Amazon hits the mark



12:42p

Shares of the New York Times up more than 6% following company's Q2 earnings report












to be replaced

























































































































    




Home


Investing


Quotes


Stocks


United States


RFI


Overview



Compare Quotes
Stock Screener
Earnings Calendar
Sectors
NYSE

 



RFI
U.S.: NYSE


Join TD Ameritrade

Find a Broker


Cohen & Steers Total Return Realty Fund Inc.

Watchlist 
CreateRFIAlert



  


Open

Last Updated: Jul 27, 2017 12:43 p.m. EDT
Real time quote



$
12.743



-0.007
-0.05%






Previous Close




$12.7500





  









Advanced Charting


1D
5D
1M
3M
6M
YTD
1Y
3Y
All




$
%
Vol


Advanced Charting

  




45.11% vs Avg.




                Volume:               
                
                    36.8K
                


                65 Day Avg. - 81.7K
            





Open: 12.75
Last: 12.743



12.6600
Day Low/High
12.7700





Day Range



11.6300
52 Week Low/High
14.2600


   








Your Watchlist



Customize MarketWatch
Have Watchlists? Log in to see them here or sign up to get started.

Create Account

                    … or Log In

















Symbol
Last
Chg
Chg %

















No Items in Watchlist
There are currently no items in this Watchlist.

Add Ticker to Watchlist




 (Go to Your Watchlist) 




No Saved Watchlists
Create a list of the investments you want to track.

Create Watchlist

                    …or try this starter list






Uh oh
Something went wrong while loading Watchlist.

Go to Watchlist



 

Recently Viewed Tickers



No Recent Tickers
Visit a quote page and your recently viewed tickers will be displayed here.

Search Tickers



















   





Overview


Profile


News


Charts


Financials


Historical Quotes


Analyst Estimates


Options


SEC Filings


Insiders



   




Key Data



Open
$12.75



Day Range
12.6600 - 12.7700



52 Week Range
11.6300 - 14.2600



Market Cap
n/a



Shares Outstanding
26.14M



Public Float
n/a



Beta
0.61



Rev. per Employee
n/a



P/E Ratio
n/a



EPS
n/a



Yield
7.52%



Dividend
$0.08



Ex-Dividend Date
Sep 20, 2017



Short Interest
3.21K
07/14/17


% of Float Shorted
n/a



Average Volume
81.67K




 


Performance




5 Day


0.10%







1 Month


1.22%







3 Month


-0.37%







YTD


5.31%







1 Year


-10.26%









  

 
 


Recent News



MarketWatch
Other Dow Jones










Dow set for another run at 17,000 as Fed minutes come into play


Jul. 9, 2014 at 6:31 a.m. ET
by Shawn Langlois













11 REIT Plays for Income and Inflation Protection


Jan. 21, 2017 at 12:34 a.m. ET
on Barron's









Pimco Trims Position as TIPS Set to Dip


May. 11, 2009 at 2:26 p.m. ET
on The Wall Street Journal









Fund Facts to Turn Brief, User-Friendly


Nov. 19, 2008 at 9:59 p.m. ET
on The Wall Street Journal









Pimco Shifts Its Tilt Toward TIPS


Oct. 29, 2008 at 12:01 a.m. ET
on The Wall Street Journal














Recent News



Other News
Press Releases






Multimedia Weekly Digest: Economic Data
Multimedia Weekly Digest: Economic Data

Jul. 27, 2017 at 9:30 a.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Busy Week For Housing Economic Data 7-26-2017 (Video)
Busy Week For Housing Economic Data 7-26-2017 (Video)

Jul. 27, 2017 at 3:08 a.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





The Truth Behind The Housing Market
The Truth Behind The Housing Market

Jul. 25, 2017 at 2:38 p.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Value And Income: It's A Matter Of Taste
Value And Income: It's A Matter Of Taste

Jul. 22, 2017 at 7:30 a.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Housing And Real Estate News 7-19-2017 (Video)
Housing And Real Estate News 7-19-2017 (Video)

Jul. 20, 2017 at 12:58 a.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Why I'm Selling My CEFL Position
Why I'm Selling My CEFL Position

Jul. 19, 2017 at 10:30 a.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





The 8% Income Portfolio: Second-Quarter 2017 Review.
The 8% Income Portfolio: Second-Quarter 2017 Review.

Jul. 17, 2017 at 1:24 p.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Housing And Real Estate News 7-8-2017 (Video)
Housing And Real Estate News 7-8-2017 (Video)

Jul. 9, 2017 at 8:17 a.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Strong H1 for mortgage REITs; broader REIT sector underperforms
Strong H1 for mortgage REITs; broader REIT sector underperforms

Jul. 7, 2017 at 4:06 p.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Mall Tour 2017 (Part II)
Mall Tour 2017 (Part II)

Jul. 6, 2017 at 2:13 p.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





High-Income, Sustainable Capital Portfolio: Second Quarter 2017
High-Income, Sustainable Capital Portfolio: Second Quarter 2017

Jul. 5, 2017 at 2:34 p.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Real Estate Prices Relative To Geography In The United States (Video)
Real Estate Prices Relative To Geography In The United States (Video)

Jul. 4, 2017 at 2:11 p.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Real Estate Investment News (Video)
Real Estate Investment News (Video)

Jul. 3, 2017 at 5:49 a.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Mall Tour 2017
Mall Tour 2017

Jun. 28, 2017 at 2:23 a.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





New Home Sales Confirm Slowdown - But Not Negative
New Home Sales Confirm Slowdown - But Not Negative

Jun. 23, 2017 at 2:56 p.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Amazon's Whole Foods Buy Could Transform Retail CRE
Amazon's Whole Foods Buy Could Transform Retail CRE

Jun. 22, 2017 at 11:04 p.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Retail Real Estate In The U.S. - Survival Of The Fittest
Retail Real Estate In The U.S. - Survival Of The Fittest

Jun. 22, 2017 at 4:48 a.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





A Further Look At The Housing Slowdown
A Further Look At The Housing Slowdown

Jun. 21, 2017 at 11:19 a.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





The Triumphant Rise Of 3D Printing: Good News For Commercial Property?
The Triumphant Rise Of 3D Printing: Good News For Commercial Property?

Jun. 20, 2017 at 3:59 a.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Housing In America: Movin' On Up
Housing In America: Movin' On Up

Jun. 14, 2017 at 10:27 p.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha









Cohen & Steers Total Return Realty Fund, Inc. (RFI) Notification of Sources of Distribution Under Section 19(a)
Cohen & Steers Total Return Realty Fund, Inc. (RFI) Notification of Sources of Distribution Under Section 19(a)

Jul. 24, 2017 at 5:56 p.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





Cohen & Steers Funds Quarterly Data Now Available
Cohen & Steers Funds Quarterly Data Now Available

Jul. 24, 2017 at 5:17 p.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





Cohen & Steers Closed-End Funds Declare Distributions for July, August and September 2017
Cohen & Steers Closed-End Funds Declare Distributions for July, August and September 2017

Jun. 28, 2017 at 6:26 p.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





Cohen & Steers Total Return Realty Fund, Inc. (RFI) Notification of Sources of Distribution Under Section 19(a)
Cohen & Steers Total Return Realty Fund, Inc. (RFI) Notification of Sources of Distribution Under Section 19(a)

Jun. 23, 2017 at 5:38 p.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





Cohen & Steers Total Return Realty Fund, Inc. (RFI) Notification of Sources of Distribution Under Section 19(a)
Cohen & Steers Total Return Realty Fund, Inc. (RFI) Notification of Sources of Distribution Under Section 19(a)

May. 22, 2017 at 6:32 p.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





Cohen & Steers Total Return Realty Fund, Inc. (RFI) Notification of Sources of Distribution Under Section 19(a)


Apr. 24, 2017 at 7:18 p.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





Cohen & Steers Closed-End Funds Declare Distributions for April, May and June 2017


Mar. 28, 2017 at 5:46 p.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





Cohen & Steers Total Return Realty Fund, Inc. (RFI) Notification of Sources of Distribution Under Section 19(a)


Mar. 24, 2017 at 5:08 p.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





Cohen & Steers Total Return Realty Fund, Inc. (RFI) Notification of Sources of Distribution Under Section 19(a)


Feb. 21, 2017 at 5:47 p.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





Cohen & Steers Funds Quarterly Data Now Available


Jan. 27, 2017 at 5:00 p.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





Cohen & Steers Total Return Realty Fund, Inc. (RFI) Notification of Sources of Distribution Under Section 19(a)


Jan. 23, 2017 at 5:32 p.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





Cohen & Steers Total Return Realty Fund, Inc. (RFI) Notification of Sources of Distribution Under Section 19(a)


Dec. 22, 2016 at 5:05 p.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





Cohen & Steers Closed-End Funds Declare Distributions for January, February and March 2017


Dec. 21, 2016 at 5:21 p.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





Cohen & Steers Total Return Realty Fund, Inc. (RFI) Notification of Sources of Distribution Under Section 19(a)


Nov. 23, 2016 at 4:55 p.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





Cohen & Steers Total Return Realty Fund, Inc. (RFI) Notification of Sources of Distribution Under Section 19(a)


Oct. 25, 2016 at 5:42 p.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





Cohen & Steers Funds Quarterly Data Now Available


Oct. 24, 2016 at 6:03 p.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





Cohen & Steers Total Return Realty Fund, Inc. (RFI) Adopts Monthly Distribution Policy and Declares Distributions for October, November and December 2016


Sep. 15, 2016 at 6:23 p.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





Cohen & Steers Total Return Realty Fund, Inc. (RFI) Declares September 2016 Quarterly Distribution


Sep. 8, 2016 at 6:23 p.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





Cohen & Steers Total Return Realty Fund, Inc. (RFI) Declares September 2016 Quarterly Distribution


Sep. 8, 2016 at 6:23 p.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF








  



 
   






   



























Partner Content























Trending Tickers
Powered by 





FB

3.47%








AMZN

0.80%








AMD

-3.69%








CLF

-9.44%








TWTR

-13.71%
























Advanced Search







Stocks



Columns


Authors


Topics







No results found





























Video Center










Learn more.Storyful, a division of News Corp, which owns MarketWatch, is a leading social media services company headquartered in Dublin, Ireland. Storyful combines world class journalism with industry-leading technology to discover, verify and acquire original content and provide the on-the-ground sources news and media organizations need to tell the stories that matter to their audience.











  RFI Quote - Cohen & Steers Total Return Realty Fund Inc - Bloomberg Markets                     



     Error: Could not add to watchlist. X   + Watchlist  Cohen & Steers Total Return Realty Fund Inc   RFI:US   New York        12.77USD   0.02   0.16%     As of 12:32 PM EDT 7/27/2017     Open   12.75    Day Range   12.66 - 12.77    Previous Close   12.75    52Wk Range   11.63 - 14.26    1 Yr Return   -1.56%    YTD Return   10.36%                   


                Before it's here, it's on the Bloomberg Terminal.
            

                Learn More
            

         Open   12.75    Day Range   12.66 - 12.77    Volume   32,806    Previous Close   12.75    52Wk Range   11.63 - 14.26    1 Yr Return   -1.30%    YTD Return   10.36%    NAV (on 07/26/2017)   13.53999996    Total Assets (m USD) (on 04/28/2017)   349.100    Inception Date   09/17/1993    Premium/Discount   -5.83%    Average 52-Week Premium   -6.82%    Fund Managers   JOSEPH MARTIN HARVEY / WILLIAM F SCAPELL    Last Dividend (on 08/15/2017)   0.08    Dividend Indicated Gross Yield   7.58%    Expense Ratio   0.38%    3 Mo Return   1.67%    3 Yr Return   10.13%    5 Yr Return   8.46%                Top Fund Holdings       Name Position Value % of Fund        SPG:US   Simon Property Group Inc    106.44 k 17.22 m 4.91      UDR:US   UDR Inc    396.54 k 15.45 m 4.41      EQIX:US   Equinix Inc    35.07 k 15.05 m 4.29      PLD:US   Prologis Inc    252.72 k 14.82 m 4.22      EQR:US   Equity Residential    187.09 k 12.32 m 3.51      ESS:US   Essex Property Trust Inc    40.91 k 10.52 m 3.00      KRC:US   Kilroy Realty Corp    125.99 k 9.47 m 2.70      ACC:US   American Campus Communities In    190.47 k 9.01 m 2.57      HTA:US   Healthcare Trust of America In    284.12 k 8.84 m 2.52      HST:US   Host Hotels & Resorts Inc    480.33 k 8.78 m 2.50           Profile   Cohen and Steers Total Return Realty Fund Inc is a closed-end management investment company incorporated in the USA.  The Fund's objective is high total return, placing an emphasis on current income and capital appreciation.  The Fund invests at least 75% of its assets in equity and equity-related securities of real estate companies.    Address  Cohen & Steers Capital Mgmt Inc.280 Park Avenue10th FloorNew York, NY 10017USA   Phone  1-212-832-3232   Website   www.cohenandsteers.com              



    RFI News - Cohen & Steers Total Return Realty Fund Inc. Company News & Press Releases - MarketWatch




































Bulletin






Investor Alert







New York Markets Close in:



Market Snapshot
Winners and Losers


















Expand
Keep Open
Close






Expand
Keep Open
Close






Expand
Keep Open
Close






Expand
Keep Open
Close






Expand
Keep Open
Close































Cohen & Steers Total Return Realty Fund Inc.

                  NYSE: RFI
          



GO



Set Alerts
Find a Broker




Join TD Ameritrade




Market Index


 

Overview
      
Profile
      
News
      
Charts
      
Financials
      
Historical Quotes
      
Analyst Estimates
      
Options
      
SEC Filings
      
Insiders
      


/marketstate/country/us

Cohen & Steers Total Return Realty Fund Inc.



Market open
 --Real time quotes
Jul 27, 2017, 12:43 p.m.


RFI

/quotes/zigman/131862/composite


$
12.74




Change

-0.0070
-0.05%

Volume
Volume 36,842
Real time quotes








/quotes/zigman/131862/composite
Previous close

$
			12.75
		


$
				12.74
			
Change

-0.0070
-0.05%





Day low
Day high
$12.66
$12.77










52 week low
52 week high

            $11.63
        

            $14.26
        

















/news/latest/company/us/rfi

      MarketWatch News on RFI
    





Dow set for another run at 17,000 as Fed minutes come into play

6:31 a.m. July 9, 2014
 - Shawn Langlois











/news/nonmarketwatch/company/us/rfi

      Other News on RFI
    





Multimedia Weekly Digest: Economic Data

9:30 a.m.  Today9:30 a.m. July 27, 2017
 - Seeking Alpha





Busy Week For Housing Economic Data 7-26-2017 (Video)

3:08 a.m.  Today3:08 a.m. July 27, 2017
 - Seeking Alpha





The Truth Behind The Housing Market

2:38 p.m. July 25, 2017
 - Seeking Alpha





Value And Income: It's A Matter Of Taste

7:30 a.m. July 22, 2017
 - Seeking Alpha





Housing And Real Estate News 7-19-2017 (Video)

12:58 a.m. July 20, 2017
 - Seeking Alpha





Why I'm Selling My CEFL Position

10:30 a.m. July 19, 2017
 - Seeking Alpha





The 8% Income Portfolio: Second-Quarter 2017 Review.

1:24 p.m. July 17, 2017
 - Seeking Alpha





Housing And Real Estate News 7-8-2017 (Video)

8:17 a.m. July 9, 2017
 - Seeking Alpha





Strong H1 for mortgage REITs; broader REIT sector underperforms

4:06 p.m. July 7, 2017
 - Seeking Alpha





Mall Tour 2017 (Part II)

2:13 p.m. July 6, 2017
 - Seeking Alpha





High-Income, Sustainable Capital Portfolio: Second Quarter 2017

2:34 p.m. July 5, 2017
 - Seeking Alpha





Real Estate Prices Relative To Geography In The United States (Video)

2:11 p.m. July 4, 2017
 - Seeking Alpha





Real Estate Investment News (Video)

5:49 a.m. July 3, 2017
 - Seeking Alpha





Mall Tour 2017

2:23 a.m. June 28, 2017
 - Seeking Alpha





New Home Sales Confirm Slowdown - But Not Negative

2:56 p.m. June 23, 2017
 - Seeking Alpha





Amazon's Whole Foods Buy Could Transform Retail CRE

11:04 p.m. June 22, 2017
 - Seeking Alpha





Retail Real Estate In The U.S. - Survival Of The Fittest

4:48 a.m. June 22, 2017
 - Seeking Alpha





A Further Look At The Housing Slowdown

11:19 a.m. June 21, 2017
 - Seeking Alpha





The Triumphant Rise Of 3D Printing: Good News For Commercial Property?

3:59 a.m. June 20, 2017
 - Seeking Alpha





Housing In America: Movin' On Up

10:27 p.m. June 14, 2017
 - Seeking Alpha


Loading more headlines...







/news/pressrelease/company/us/rfi

      Press Releases on RFI
    




 Cohen & Steers Total Return Realty Fund, Inc. (RFI) Notification of Sources of Distribution Under Section 19(a)
5:56 p.m. July 24, 2017
 - PR Newswire - PRF




 Cohen & Steers Funds Quarterly Data Now Available
5:17 p.m. July 24, 2017
 - PR Newswire - PRF




 Cohen & Steers Closed-End Funds Declare Distributions for July, August and September 2017
6:26 p.m. June 28, 2017
 - PR Newswire - PRF




 Cohen & Steers Total Return Realty Fund, Inc. (RFI) Notification of Sources of Distribution Under Section 19(a)
5:38 p.m. June 23, 2017
 - PR Newswire - PRF




 Cohen & Steers Total Return Realty Fund, Inc. (RFI) Notification of Sources of Distribution Under Section 19(a)
6:32 p.m. May 22, 2017
 - PR Newswire - PRF




 Cohen & Steers Total Return Realty Fund, Inc. (RFI) Notification of Sources of Distribution Under Section 19(a)
7:18 p.m. April 24, 2017
 - PR Newswire - PRF




 Cohen & Steers Closed-End Funds Declare Distributions for April, May and June 2017
5:46 p.m. March 28, 2017
 - PR Newswire - PRF




 Cohen & Steers Total Return Realty Fund, Inc. (RFI) Notification of Sources of Distribution Under Section 19(a)
5:08 p.m. March 24, 2017
 - PR Newswire - PRF




 Cohen & Steers Total Return Realty Fund, Inc. (RFI) Notification of Sources of Distribution Under Section 19(a)
6:47 p.m. Feb. 21, 2017
 - PR Newswire - PRF




 Cohen & Steers Funds Quarterly Data Now Available
6:00 p.m. Jan. 27, 2017
 - PR Newswire - PRF




 Cohen & Steers Total Return Realty Fund, Inc. (RFI) Notification of Sources of Distribution Under Section 19(a)
6:32 p.m. Jan. 23, 2017
 - PR Newswire - PRF




 Cohen & Steers Total Return Realty Fund, Inc. (RFI) Notification of Sources of Distribution Under Section 19(a)
6:05 p.m. Dec. 22, 2016
 - PR Newswire - PRF




 Cohen & Steers Closed-End Funds Declare Distributions for January, February and March 2017
6:21 p.m. Dec. 21, 2016
 - PR Newswire - PRF




 Cohen & Steers Total Return Realty Fund, Inc. (RFI) Notification of Sources of Distribution Under Section 19(a)
5:55 p.m. Nov. 23, 2016
 - PR Newswire - PRF




 Cohen & Steers Total Return Realty Fund, Inc. (RFI) Notification of Sources of Distribution Under Section 19(a)
5:42 p.m. Oct. 25, 2016
 - PR Newswire - PRF




 Cohen & Steers Funds Quarterly Data Now Available
6:03 p.m. Oct. 24, 2016
 - PR Newswire - PRF




 Cohen & Steers Total Return Realty Fund, Inc. (RFI) Adopts Monthly Distribution Policy and Declares Distributions for October, November and December 2016
6:23 p.m. Sept. 15, 2016
 - PR Newswire - PRF




 Cohen & Steers Total Return Realty Fund, Inc. (RFI) Declares September 2016 Quarterly Distribution
6:23 p.m. Sept. 8, 2016
 - PR Newswire - PRF




 Cohen & Steers Total Return Realty Fund, Inc. (RFI) Declares September 2016 Quarterly Distribution
6:23 p.m. Sept. 8, 2016
 - PR Newswire - PRF




















Trending Tickers


/quotes/zigman/17636479/composite VUZI+15.60%


/quotes/zigman/237947/composite JCP-5.83%


/quotes/zigman/59392505/composite NUGT-2.93%


/quotes/zigman/59386294/composite JNUG-5.94%


/quotes/zigman/65801738/composite TLT+1.11%


X




Powered by














Log In




12:48 PM EDT
July 27, 2017


/marketstate/country/us
New York

	Open


/marketstate/country/uk
London

	Closed


/marketstate/country/jp
Tokyo

	Closed





/marketstate/country/us
 


/marketstate/country/uk
 


/marketstate/country/jp
 











View All



Latest News

/news/latest
12:48pWill having a baby bankrupt you? Use this calculator to find out 
12:48pThese cash-strapped couples want total strangers to pay for their weddings
12:47pBottled water is more popular than Pepsi and Coke — why you should avoid all three
12:47pJared Kushner’s unorthodox approach to meetings is a cautionary tale for workers everywhere
12:46pShares of Automatic Data Processing Inc. jump 10% in afternoon trade 
12:46pDow industrials up 49 points, or 0.2%, at 21,760
12:46pS&P 500 struggles to hold onto gains, up a fraction of a point
12:45pTrump puts his hands together for ‘the late, great Abraham Lincoln’
12:44pBREAKINGNasdaq slips into negative territory, down 5 points at 6,417
12:43pFacebook joins exclusive $500 billion club one day after Amazon hits the mark
12:42pShares of the New York Times up more than 6% following company's Q2 earnings report
12:42pYour SoulCycle obsession may soon be replaced by Planet Fitness
12:40pShares of Netflix are down more than 2%
12:39pStarbucks earnings: Well-positioned for global growth, but same-store sales a concern
12:38pAll the companies in Jeff Bezos’s empire, in one (large) chart
12:35pFTSE 100 closes lower as AstraZeneca plunges; Diageo shares surge 
12:35pAmazon earnings: Analysts recognize its dominant position in the U.S., look abroad
12:35pWaters has testy exchange with Mnuchin over Trump financing
12:30pKering profit boosted by Gucci sales
12:29pHollywood fighting Netflix is like yelling at an oncoming tsunami
Loading more headlines...




dow

/quotes/zigman/627449/realtime
21,759.14

+48.13
+0.22%





nasdaq

/quotes/zigman/12633936/realtime
6,423.35

+0.60
+0.01%





s&p 500

/quotes/zigman/3870025/realtime
2,478.97

+1.14
+0.05%













Kiosk


1352872800000
1352872800000


The RetireMentors






				Retirement advice from our industry experts
				Our team of financial professionals can help you plan and save 
					for retirement, then 
				live well in it.



/conga/kiosk/retirementors.html
361307




1320411600000
1320616500000


Alerts



/conga/kiosk/alerts.html
310238




1333717800000
1333964100000


Virtual Stock Exchange





Our free stock-market game
				• Trade your virtual portfolio in real time
				• Talk strategies in group discussions
				• Find or create a game that suits you
				• Use our learning center to improve 



/conga/kiosk/games.html
310284




1245657600000
1277280000000


Location Scouts




Housing-market insights from our realty pros
																																																							Plus the latest data from Realtor.com on 21 home markets across the U.S.
• See our complete Real Estate site


/conga/kiosk/real_estate.html
357012




1404799200000
1404799200000


Lazy Portfolios





				Set it and forget it
				Check out the returns on our 8 Lazy Portfolios that are made up 
				of low-cost 
				buy-and-hold index funds.

				• How to create your own Lazy Portfolio


/conga/kiosk/lazy_portfolio.html
313134














MarketWatch.com




Site Index
Topics
Help
Feedback
Newsroom Roster

                    Media Archive
Premium Products
Mobile


Company Info
Code of Conduct
Corrections
Advertising Media Kit
Advertise Locally
Reprints & Licensing
Broker Center

                    Your Ad Choices


Follow MarketWatch


































RSS
Podcasts






WSJ.com
Barron's Online
BigCharts
Virtual Stock Exchange


Financial News London
WSJ.com Small Business
realtor.com
Mansion Global












		Copyright © 2017 MarketWatch, Inc.  All rights reserved.
		By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Service,
        Privacy Policy and Cookie Policy.
	



            Intraday Data provided by SIX Financial Information and subject to terms of use. Historical and current end-of-day data provided by SIX Financial Information. All quotes are in local exchange time. Real-time last sale data for U.S. stock quotes reflect trades reported through Nasdaq only. Intraday data delayed at least 15 minutes or per exchange requirements.
        






MarketWatch Top Stories
Link to MarketWatch's Slice.

15


























































    RFI Key Statistics - Cohen & Steers Total Return Realty Fund Inc. Financial Ratios - MarketWatch




































Bulletin






Investor Alert







New York Markets Close in:



Market Snapshot
Winners and Losers


















Expand
Keep Open
Close






Expand
Keep Open
Close






Expand
Keep Open
Close






Expand
Keep Open
Close






Expand
Keep Open
Close































Cohen & Steers Total Return Realty Fund Inc.

                  NYSE: RFI
          



GO



Set Alerts
Find a Broker




Join TD Ameritrade




Market Index


 

Overview
      
Profile
      
News
      
Charts
      
Financials
      
Historical Quotes
      
Analyst Estimates
      
Options
      
SEC Filings
      
Insiders
      


/marketstate/country/us

Cohen & Steers Total Return Realty Fund Inc.



Market open
 --Real time quotes
Jul 27, 2017, 12:43 p.m.


RFI

/quotes/zigman/131862/composite


$
12.74




Change

-0.0070
-0.05%

Volume
Volume 36,842
Real time quotes








/quotes/zigman/131862/composite
Previous close

$
			12.75
		


$
				12.74
			
Change

-0.0070
-0.05%





Day low
Day high
$12.66
$12.77










52 week low
52 week high

            $11.63
        

            $14.26
        

















      Officers and Executives
    



Name
Age
Officer Since
Title





Mr. Robert Hamilton Steers 
62
-
Chairman



Mr. Adam M. Derechin 
51
-
President & Chief Executive Officer



Mr. James  Giallanza 
49
2006
Chief Financial Officer & Treasurer



Mr. Joseph Martin Harvey 
52
1992
Director & Vice President



Mr. Thomas N. Bohjalian 
-
2006
Vice President





Insider Actions


 – Purchase

 – Sale
1
 – Number of Transactions











{"OrganizationDocuments":[{"Documents":[{"document":[{"reportDateGroup":[{"reportDate":"2011-06-09","tradeTypeGroup":[{"numTransactions":"5","tradeType":"A"}]},{"reportDate":"2011-05-17","tradeTypeGroup":[{"numTransactions":"3","tradeType":"D"},{"numTransactions":"1","tradeType":"A"}]},{"reportDate":"2011-05-16","tradeTypeGroup":[{"numTransactions":"2","tradeType":"D"},{"numTransactions":"8","tradeType":"A"}]},{"reportDate":"2011-05-13","tradeTypeGroup":[{"numTransactions":"1","tradeType":"D"}]},{"reportDate":"2011-05-12","tradeTypeGroup":[{"numTransactions":"1","tradeType":"D"}]},{"reportDate":"2011-05-11","tradeTypeGroup":[{"numTransactions":"1","tradeType":"D"}]},{"reportDate":"2011-05-02","tradeTypeGroup":[{"numTransactions":"1","tradeType":"D"}]},{"reportDate":"2011-03-10","tradeTypeGroup":[{"numTransactions":"5","tradeType":"A"}]},{"reportDate":"2011-02-17","tradeTypeGroup":[{"numTransactions":"4","tradeType":"D"},{"numTransactions":"2","tradeType":"A"}]},{"reportDate":"2011-02-15","tradeTypeGroup":[{"numTransactions":"8","tradeType":"A"},{"numTransactions":"1","tradeType":"D"}]}]}]}]}]}



/news/latest/company/us/rfi

      MarketWatch News on RFI
    





Dow set for another run at 17,000 as Fed minutes come into play

6:31 a.m. July 9, 2014
 - Shawn Langlois









/news/nonmarketwatch/company/us/rfi

      Other News on RFI
    





Multimedia Weekly Digest: Economic Data

9:30 a.m.  Today9:30 a.m. July 27, 2017
 - Seeking Alpha





Busy Week For Housing Economic Data 7-26-2017 (Video)

3:08 a.m.  Today3:08 a.m. July 27, 2017
 - Seeking Alpha





The Truth Behind The Housing Market

2:38 p.m. July 25, 2017
 - Seeking Alpha





Value And Income: It's A Matter Of Taste

7:30 a.m. July 22, 2017
 - Seeking Alpha





Housing And Real Estate News 7-19-2017 (Video)

12:58 a.m. July 20, 2017
 - Seeking Alpha





Why I'm Selling My CEFL Position

10:30 a.m. July 19, 2017
 - Seeking Alpha





The 8% Income Portfolio: Second-Quarter 2017 Review.

1:24 p.m. July 17, 2017
 - Seeking Alpha





Housing And Real Estate News 7-8-2017 (Video)

8:17 a.m. July 9, 2017
 - Seeking Alpha





Strong H1 for mortgage REITs; broader REIT sector underperforms

4:06 p.m. July 7, 2017
 - Seeking Alpha





Mall Tour 2017 (Part II)

2:13 p.m. July 6, 2017
 - Seeking Alpha





High-Income, Sustainable Capital Portfolio: Second Quarter 2017

2:34 p.m. July 5, 2017
 - Seeking Alpha





Real Estate Prices Relative To Geography In The United States (Video)

2:11 p.m. July 4, 2017
 - Seeking Alpha





Real Estate Investment News (Video)

5:49 a.m. July 3, 2017
 - Seeking Alpha





Mall Tour 2017

2:23 a.m. June 28, 2017
 - Seeking Alpha





New Home Sales Confirm Slowdown - But Not Negative

2:56 p.m. June 23, 2017
 - Seeking Alpha





Amazon's Whole Foods Buy Could Transform Retail CRE

11:04 p.m. June 22, 2017
 - Seeking Alpha





Retail Real Estate In The U.S. - Survival Of The Fittest

4:48 a.m. June 22, 2017
 - Seeking Alpha





A Further Look At The Housing Slowdown

11:19 a.m. June 21, 2017
 - Seeking Alpha





The Triumphant Rise Of 3D Printing: Good News For Commercial Property?

3:59 a.m. June 20, 2017
 - Seeking Alpha





Housing In America: Movin' On Up

10:27 p.m. June 14, 2017
 - Seeking Alpha


Loading more headlines...












At a Glance

Cohen & Steers Total Return Realty Fund, Inc.
280 Park Avenue
10th floor

New York, New York 10017




Phone
1 2128323232


Industry
Closed-End Funds


Sector
Financial Services


Fiscal Year-end
-


View SEC Filings




Revenue
N/A


Net Income
N/A


Employees

        -


Annual Report for RFI











/news/pressrelease/company/us/rfi

      Press Releases on RFI
    




 Cohen & Steers Total Return Realty Fund, Inc. (RFI) Notification of Sources of Distribution Under Section 19(a)
5:56 p.m. July 24, 2017
 - PR Newswire - PRF




 Cohen & Steers Funds Quarterly Data Now Available
5:17 p.m. July 24, 2017
 - PR Newswire - PRF




 Cohen & Steers Closed-End Funds Declare Distributions for July, August and September 2017
6:26 p.m. June 28, 2017
 - PR Newswire - PRF




 Cohen & Steers Total Return Realty Fund, Inc. (RFI) Notification of Sources of Distribution Under Section 19(a)
5:38 p.m. June 23, 2017
 - PR Newswire - PRF




 Cohen & Steers Total Return Realty Fund, Inc. (RFI) Notification of Sources of Distribution Under Section 19(a)
6:32 p.m. May 22, 2017
 - PR Newswire - PRF




 Cohen & Steers Total Return Realty Fund, Inc. (RFI) Notification of Sources of Distribution Under Section 19(a)
7:18 p.m. April 24, 2017
 - PR Newswire - PRF




 Cohen & Steers Closed-End Funds Declare Distributions for April, May and June 2017
5:46 p.m. March 28, 2017
 - PR Newswire - PRF




 Cohen & Steers Total Return Realty Fund, Inc. (RFI) Notification of Sources of Distribution Under Section 19(a)
5:08 p.m. March 24, 2017
 - PR Newswire - PRF




 Cohen & Steers Total Return Realty Fund, Inc. (RFI) Notification of Sources of Distribution Under Section 19(a)
6:47 p.m. Feb. 21, 2017
 - PR Newswire - PRF




 Cohen & Steers Funds Quarterly Data Now Available
6:00 p.m. Jan. 27, 2017
 - PR Newswire - PRF




 Cohen & Steers Total Return Realty Fund, Inc. (RFI) Notification of Sources of Distribution Under Section 19(a)
6:32 p.m. Jan. 23, 2017
 - PR Newswire - PRF




 Cohen & Steers Total Return Realty Fund, Inc. (RFI) Notification of Sources of Distribution Under Section 19(a)
6:05 p.m. Dec. 22, 2016
 - PR Newswire - PRF




 Cohen & Steers Closed-End Funds Declare Distributions for January, February and March 2017
6:21 p.m. Dec. 21, 2016
 - PR Newswire - PRF




 Cohen & Steers Total Return Realty Fund, Inc. (RFI) Notification of Sources of Distribution Under Section 19(a)
5:55 p.m. Nov. 23, 2016
 - PR Newswire - PRF




 Cohen & Steers Total Return Realty Fund, Inc. (RFI) Notification of Sources of Distribution Under Section 19(a)
5:42 p.m. Oct. 25, 2016
 - PR Newswire - PRF




 Cohen & Steers Funds Quarterly Data Now Available
6:03 p.m. Oct. 24, 2016
 - PR Newswire - PRF




 Cohen & Steers Total Return Realty Fund, Inc. (RFI) Adopts Monthly Distribution Policy and Declares Distributions for October, November and December 2016
6:23 p.m. Sept. 15, 2016
 - PR Newswire - PRF




 Cohen & Steers Total Return Realty Fund, Inc. (RFI) Declares September 2016 Quarterly Distribution
6:23 p.m. Sept. 8, 2016
 - PR Newswire - PRF




 Cohen & Steers Total Return Realty Fund, Inc. (RFI) Declares September 2016 Quarterly Distribution
6:23 p.m. Sept. 8, 2016
 - PR Newswire - PRF











Trending Tickers


/quotes/zigman/17636479/composite VUZI+15.60%


/quotes/zigman/237947/composite JCP-5.83%


/quotes/zigman/59392505/composite NUGT-2.93%


/quotes/zigman/59386294/composite JNUG-5.94%


/quotes/zigman/65801738/composite TLT+1.11%


X




Powered by














Log In




12:48 PM EDT
July 27, 2017


/marketstate/country/us
New York

	Open


/marketstate/country/uk
London

	Closed


/marketstate/country/jp
Tokyo

	Closed





/marketstate/country/us
 


/marketstate/country/uk
 


/marketstate/country/jp
 











View All



Latest News

/news/latest
12:48pWill having a baby bankrupt you? Use this calculator to find out 
12:48pThese cash-strapped couples want total strangers to pay for their weddings
12:47pBottled water is more popular than Pepsi and Coke — why you should avoid all three
12:47pJared Kushner’s unorthodox approach to meetings is a cautionary tale for workers everywhere
12:46pShares of Automatic Data Processing Inc. jump 10% in afternoon trade 
12:46pDow industrials up 49 points, or 0.2%, at 21,760
12:46pS&P 500 struggles to hold onto gains, up a fraction of a point
12:45pTrump puts his hands together for ‘the late, great Abraham Lincoln’
12:44pBREAKINGNasdaq slips into negative territory, down 5 points at 6,417
12:43pFacebook joins exclusive $500 billion club one day after Amazon hits the mark
12:42pShares of the New York Times up more than 6% following company's Q2 earnings report
12:42pYour SoulCycle obsession may soon be replaced by Planet Fitness
12:40pShares of Netflix are down more than 2%
12:39pStarbucks earnings: Well-positioned for global growth, but same-store sales a concern
12:38pAll the companies in Jeff Bezos’s empire, in one (large) chart
12:35pFTSE 100 closes lower as AstraZeneca plunges; Diageo shares surge 
12:35pAmazon earnings: Analysts recognize its dominant position in the U.S., look abroad
12:35pWaters has testy exchange with Mnuchin over Trump financing
12:30pKering profit boosted by Gucci sales
12:29pHollywood fighting Netflix is like yelling at an oncoming tsunami
Loading more headlines...




dow

/quotes/zigman/627449/realtime
21,759.04

+48.03
+0.22%





nasdaq

/quotes/zigman/12633936/realtime
6,423.29

+0.54
+0.01%





s&p 500

/quotes/zigman/3870025/realtime
2,478.98

+1.15
+0.05%













Kiosk


1352872800000
1352872800000


The RetireMentors






				Retirement advice from our industry experts
				Our team of financial professionals can help you plan and save 
					for retirement, then 
				live well in it.



/conga/kiosk/retirementors.html
361307




1320411600000
1320616500000


Alerts



/conga/kiosk/alerts.html
310238




1333717800000
1333964100000


Virtual Stock Exchange





Our free stock-market game
				• Trade your virtual portfolio in real time
				• Talk strategies in group discussions
				• Find or create a game that suits you
				• Use our learning center to improve 



/conga/kiosk/games.html
310284




1245657600000
1277280000000


Location Scouts




Housing-market insights from our realty pros
																																																							Plus the latest data from Realtor.com on 21 home markets across the U.S.
• See our complete Real Estate site


/conga/kiosk/real_estate.html
357012




1404799200000
1404799200000


Lazy Portfolios





				Set it and forget it
				Check out the returns on our 8 Lazy Portfolios that are made up 
				of low-cost 
				buy-and-hold index funds.

				• How to create your own Lazy Portfolio


/conga/kiosk/lazy_portfolio.html
313134














MarketWatch.com




Site Index
Topics
Help
Feedback
Newsroom Roster

                    Media Archive
Premium Products
Mobile


Company Info
Code of Conduct
Corrections
Advertising Media Kit
Advertise Locally
Reprints & Licensing
Broker Center

                    Your Ad Choices


Follow MarketWatch


































RSS
Podcasts






WSJ.com
Barron's Online
BigCharts
Virtual Stock Exchange


Financial News London
WSJ.com Small Business
realtor.com
Mansion Global












		Copyright © 2017 MarketWatch, Inc.  All rights reserved.
		By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Service,
        Privacy Policy and Cookie Policy.
	



            Intraday Data provided by SIX Financial Information and subject to terms of use. Historical and current end-of-day data provided by SIX Financial Information. All quotes are in local exchange time. Real-time last sale data for U.S. stock quotes reflect trades reported through Nasdaq only. Intraday data delayed at least 15 minutes or per exchange requirements.
        






MarketWatch Top Stories
Link to MarketWatch's Slice.

15












































































 



 Cohen & Steers Quality Income Realty Fund, Inc. (RQI) Notification of Sources of Distribution Under 
         










    










 













 











 



















Cohen & Steers Quality Income Realty Fund, Inc. (RQI) Notification of Sources of Distribution Under Section 19(a)
        																																
              











 News provided by
Cohen & Steers  
Jul 24, 2017, 18:11 ET









 Share this article




























































NEW YORK, July 24, 2017 /PRNewswire/ -- This press release provides shareholders of Cohen & Steers Quality Income Realty Fund, Inc. (NYSE:    RQI) (the "Fund") with information regarding the sources of the distribution to be paid on July 31, 2017 and cumulative distributions paid fiscal year-to-date. 








In December 2012, the Fund implemented a managed distribution policy in accordance with exemptive relief issued by the Securities and Exchange Commission. The managed distribution policy seeks to deliver the Fund's long-term total return potential through regular monthly distributions declared at a fixed rate per common share. The policy gives the Fund greater flexibility to realize long-term capital gains throughout the year and to distribute those gains on a regular monthly basis to shareholders. The Board of Directors of the Fund may amend, terminate or suspend the managed distribution policy at any time, which could have an adverse effect on the market price of the Fund's shares.  
The Fund's monthly distributions may include long-term capital gains, short-term capital gains, net investment income and/or return of capital for federal income tax purposes. Return of capital includes distributions paid by the Fund in excess of its net investment income and net realized capital gains and such excess is distributed from the Fund's assets. A return of capital is not taxable; rather, it reduces a shareholder's tax basis in his or her shares of the Fund. In addition, distributions from the Fund's investments in real estate investment trusts (REITs) may later be characterized as capital gains and/or a return of capital, depending on the character of the dividends reported to the Fund after year end by REITs held by the Fund. The amount of monthly distributions may vary depending on a number of factors, including changes in portfolio and market conditions.
At the time of each monthly distribution, information will be posted to cohenandsteers.com and mailed to shareholders in a concurrent notice. However, this information may change at the end of the year because the final tax characteristics of the Fund's distributions cannot be determined with certainty until after the end of the calendar year. Final tax characteristics of all of the Fund's distributions will be provided on Form 1099-DIV, which is mailed after the close of the calendar year.
The following table sets forth the estimated amounts of the current distribution and the cumulative distributions paid this fiscal year-to-date from the sources indicated. All amounts are expressed per common share.




 DISTRIBUTION ESTIMATES 
 July 2017 
 YEAR-TO-DATE (YTD)  July 31, 2017* 


 Source 
 Per Share Amount 
 % of Current Distribution 
 Per Share Amount 
 % of 2017 Distributions 


 Net Investment Income 
 $0.0000 
 0.00% 
 $0.0000 
 0.00% 


 Net Realized Short-Term Capital Gains 
 $0.0000 
 0.00% 
 $0.0000 
 0.00% 


 Net Realized Long-Term Capital Gains 
 $0.0800 
 100.00% 
 $0.5600 
 100.00% 


 Return of Capital (or other Capital Source) 
 $0.0000 
 0.00% 
 $0.0000 
 0.00% 


 Total Current Distribution 
 $0.0800 
 100.00% 
 $0.5600 
 100.00% 




You should not draw any conclusions about the Fund's investment performance from the amount of this distribution or from the terms of the Fund's managed distribution policy. The amounts and sources of distributions reported in this Notice are only estimates, are likely to change over time, and are not being provided for tax reporting purposes. The actual amounts and sources of the amounts for accounting and tax reporting purposes will depend upon the Fund's investment experience during the remainder of its fiscal year and may be subject to changes based on tax regulations. The amounts and sources of distributions year-to-date may be subject to additional adjustments.  
*THE FUND WILL SEND YOU A FORM 1099-DIV FOR THE CALENDAR YEAR THAT WILL TELL YOU HOW TO REPORT THESE DISTRIBUTIONS FOR FEDERAL INCOME TAX PURPOSES.
The Fund's Year-to-date Cumulative Total Return for fiscal year 2017 (January 1, 2017 through June 30, 2017) is set forth below. Shareholders should take note of the relationship between the Year-to-date Cumulative Total Return with the Fund's Cumulative Distribution Rate for 2017. In addition, the Fund's Average Annual Total Return for the five-year period ending June 30, 2017 is set forth below. Shareholders should note the relationship between the Average Annual Total Return with the Fund's Current Annualized Distribution Rate for 2017. The performance and distribution rate information disclosed in the table is based on the Fund's net asset value per share (NAV). The Fund's NAV is calculated as the total market value of all the securities and other assets held by the Fund minus the total liabilities, divided by the total number of shares outstanding. While NAV performance may be indicative of the Fund's investment performance, it does not measure the value of a shareholder's individual investment in the Fund. The value of a shareholder's investment in the Fund is determined by the Fund's market price, which is based on the supply and demand for the Fund's shares in the open market. 
Fund Performance and Distribution Rate Information: 




 Year-to-date January 1, 2017 to June 30, 2017 


 Year-to-date Cumulative Total Return1 
 5.37% 


 Cumulative Distribution Rate2 
 4.11% 





 Five-year period ending June 30, 2017 


 Average Annual Total Return3 
 12.57% 


 Current Annualized Distribution Rate4 
 7.05% 








 1. 
 Year-to-date Cumulative Total Return is the percentage change in the Fund's NAV over the year-to-date time period including distributions paid and assuming reinvestment of those distributions. 


 2. 
 Cumulative Distribution Rate for the Fund's current fiscal period (January 1, 2017 through June 30, 2017) measured on the dollar value of distributions in the year-to-date period as a percentage of the Fund's NAV as of June 30, 2017. 


 3. 
 Average Annual Total Return represents the compound average of the Annual NAV Total Returns of the Fund for the five-year period ending June 30, 2017. Annual NAV Total Return is the percentage change in the Fund's NAV over a year including distributions paid and assuming reinvestment of those distributions. 


 4. 
 The Current Annualized Distribution Rate is the current fiscal period's distribution rate annualized as a percentage of the Fund's NAV as of June 30, 2017. 




Investors should consider the investment objectives, risks, charges and expense of the fund carefully before investing. You can obtain the fund's most recent periodic reports, when available, and other regulatory filings by contacting your financial advisor or visiting cohenandsteers.com. These reports and other filings can be found on the Securities and Exchange Commission's EDGAR Database. You should read these reports and other filings carefully before investing. 
Shareholders should not use the information provided in preparing their tax returns. Shareholders will receive a Form 1099-DIV for the calendar year indicating how to report Fund distributions for federal income tax purposes.
Website: http://cohenandsteers.com/Symbol: NYSE:    CNS
About Cohen & Steers. Cohen & Steers is a global investment manager specializing in liquid real assets, including real estate securities, listed infrastructure, commodities and natural resource equities, as well as preferred securities and other income solutions. Founded in 1986, the firm is headquartered in New York City, with offices in London, Hong Kong, Tokyo and Seattle. 
 
View original content:http://www.prnewswire.com/news-releases/cohen--steers-quality-income-realty-fund-inc-rqi-notification-of-sources-of-distribution-under-section-19a-300493200.html
SOURCE Cohen & Steers
 Related Links

http://www.cohenandsteers.com



 












Jul 24, 2017, 18:18 ET
Preview: Cohen & Steers Select Preferred and Income Fund, Inc. (PSF) Notification of Sources of Distribution Under Section 19(a)













Jul 24, 2017, 17:56 ET
Preview: Cohen & Steers Total Return Realty Fund, Inc. (RFI) Notification of Sources of Distribution Under Section 19(a)






My News


  Release contains wide tables.	  View fullscreen.






 Also from this source




 

Jul 24, 2017, 18:18 ET
                                  				                                                                                     
                              Cohen & Steers Select Preferred and Income Fund, Inc. (PSF)...








 

Jul 24, 2017, 17:56 ET
                                  				                                                                                     
                              Cohen & Steers Total Return Realty Fund, Inc. (RFI) Notification...





 Explore
 More news releases in similar topics

  Banking & Financial Services
  Mutual Funds








 You just read:
Cohen & Steers Quality Income Realty Fund, Inc. (RQI) Notification of Sources of Distribution Under Section 19(a)


 News provided by
Cohen & Steers  
Jul 24, 2017, 18:11 ET








 Share this article









































 











Looking to send a news release with PR Newswire?
Take advantage of the world's leading distribution platform.
Sign up to get started
Request more information
Have an account? Log In

















Search











Searching for your content...









Advanced Search












































 


Cohen & Steers Total Return Realty Fund, Inc. (RFI) Adopts Monthly Distribution Policy and Declares Distributions for October, November and December 2016HomeMailFlickrTumblrNewsSportsFinanceCelebrityAnswersGroupsMobileMoreTry Yahoo Finance on Firefox »YahooSearchSearchSign inU.S. Markets close in 3 hrs 12 minsS&P 5002,479.14+1.31 (+0.05%)Dow 3021,759.51+48.50 (+0.22%)Nasdaq6,423.35+0.60 (+0.01%)Today's ChartsTODAY'S CHARTS: High expectations for Amazon earningsCohen & Steers Total Return Realty Fund, Inc. (RFI) Adopts Monthly Distribution Policy and Declares Distributions for October, November and December 2016PR NewswireSeptember 15, 2016ReblogShareTweetShareNEW YORK, Sept. 15, 2016 /PRNewswire/ -- The Board of Directors of Cohen & Steers Total Return Realty Fund, Inc. (RFI) (the "Fund") announced today a change of the Fund's dividend distribution schedule from quarterly to monthly, beginning in October, 2016. The move to monthly distributions is being made to better align the Fund with its peers. The Board of Directors also declared the monthly distributions for October, November and December, as summarized in the chart below:  Month   Ex-Date   Record Date   Payable Date   Rate Per Share     October   Oct. 18, 2016   Oct. 20, 2016   Oct. 31, 2016   $0.080     November   Nov. 16, 2016   Nov. 18, 2016   Nov. 30, 2016   $0.080     December   Dec. 9, 2016   Dec. 13, 2016   Dec. 30, 2016   $0.080  In December 2011, the Fund implemented a managed distribution policy in accordance with exemptive relief issued by the Securities and Exchange Commission. The managed distribution policy seeks to deliver the Fund's long-term total return potential through regular monthly distributions declared at a fixed rate per common share. The policy gives the Fund greater flexibility to realize long-term capital gains throughout the year and to distribute those gains on a regular monthly basis to shareholders. The Board of Directors of the Fund may amend, terminate or suspend the managed distribution policy at any time, which could have an adverse effect on the market price of the Fund's shares. The Fund's monthly distributions may include long-term capital gains, short-term capital gains, net investment income and/or return of capital for federal income tax purposes. Return of capital includes distributions paid by the Fund in excess of its net investment income and net realized capital gains and such excess is distributed from the Fund's assets. A return of capital is not taxable; rather, it reduces a shareholder's tax basis in his or her shares of the Fund. In addition, distributions from the Fund's investments in real estate investment trusts (REITs) may later be characterized as capital gains and/or a return of capital, depending on the character of the dividends reported to the Fund after year-end by REITs held by the Fund. The amount of monthly distributions may vary depending on a number of factors, including changes in portfolio and market conditions.At the time of each monthly distribution, updated estimates of the distribution components and updated performance and distribution rate information will be posted to cohenandsteers.com and mailed to shareholders in a concurrent notice. However, this information may change at the end of the year because the final tax characteristics of the Fund's distributions cannot be determined with certainty until after the end of the calendar year. Final tax characteristics of all of the Fund's distributions will be provided on Form 1099-DIV, which is mailed after the close of the calendar year.The following table sets forth the estimated amounts of the current distributions and the cumulative distributions paid this fiscal year to date from the sources indicated. All amounts are expressed per common share.  DISTRIBUTION ESTIMATES   Fourth Quarter 2016   YEAR-TO-DATE (YTD) December 31, 2016*     Source   Per Share Amount   % of Current Distribution   Per Share Amount   % of 2016 Distributions     Net Investment Income   $0.1166   48.58%   $0.3449   35.93%     Net Realized Short-Term Capital Gains   $0.0171   7.13%   $0.0171   1.78%     Net Realized Long-Term Capital Gains   $0.1063   44.29%   $0.5980   62.29%     Return of Capital (or other Capital Source)   $0.0000   0.00%   $0.0000   0.00%     Total Current Distribution   $0.2400   100.00%   $0.9600   100.00%  You should not draw any conclusions about the Fund's investment performance from the amount of this distribution or from the terms of the Fund's managed distribution policy. The amounts and sources of distributions reported in this Notice are only estimates, are likely to change over time, and are not being provided for tax reporting purposes. The actual amounts and sources of the amounts for accounting and tax reporting purposes will depend upon the Fund's investment experience during the remainder of its fiscal year and may be subject to changes based on tax regulations. The amounts and sources of distributions year-to-date may be subject to additional adjustments.  *THE FUND WILL SEND YOU A FORM 1099-DIV FOR THE CALENDAR YEAR THAT WILL TELL YOU HOW TO REPORT THESE DISTRIBUTIONS FOR FEDERAL INCOME TAX PURPOSES.The Fund's Year-to-date Cumulative Total Return for fiscal year 2016 (January 1, 2016 through August 31, 2016) is set forth below. Shareholders should take note of the relationship between the Year-to-date Cumulative Total Return with the Fund's Cumulative Distribution Rate for 2016. Moreover, the Fund's Average Annual Total Return for the five-year period ending August 31, 2016 is set forth below. Shareholders should also note the relationship between the Average Annual Total Return with the Fund's Current Annualized Distribution Rate for 2016. In addition, the performance and distribution rate information disclosed in the table below is based on the Fund's net asset value per share (NAV). The Fund's NAV is calculated as the total market value of all the securities and other assets held by the Fund minus the total liabilities, divided by the total number of shares outstanding. While NAV performance may be indicative of the Fund's investment performance, it does not measure the value of a shareholder's individual investment in the Fund. The value of a shareholder's investment in the Fund is determined by the Fund's market price, which is based on the supply and demand for the Fund's shares in the open market.Read MoreFund Performance and Distribution Rate Information:  Year-to-date January 1, 2016 to August 31, 2016     Year-to-date Cumulative Total Return1   11.03%     Cumulative Distribution Rate2   6.58%        Five-year period ending August 31, 2016     Average Annual Total Return3   12.96%     Current Annualized Distribution Rate4   6.58%        1.   Year-to-date Cumulative Total Return is the percentage change in the Fund's NAV over the year-to-date time period including distributions paid and assuming reinvestment of those distributions.     2.   Cumulative Distribution Rate for the Fund's current fiscal period (January 1, 2016 through August 31, 2016) measured on the dollar value of distributions in the year-to-date period as a percentage of the Fund's NAV as of August 31, 2016.     3.   Average Annual Total Return represents the compound average of the Annual NAV Total Returns of the Fund for the five-year period ending August 31, 2016. Annual NAV Total Return is the percentage change in the Fund's NAV over a year including distributions paid and assuming reinvestment of those distributions.     4.   The Current Annualized Distribution Rate is the current fiscal period's distribution rate annualized as a percentage of the Fund's NAV as of August 31, 2016.  Shareholders should not use the information provided in preparing their tax returns. Shareholders will receive a Form 1099-DIV for the calendar year indicating how to report Fund distributions for federal income tax purposes.More information is available at cohenandsteers.com.Symbol: (CNS)About Cohen & Steers. Cohen & Steers is a global investment manager specializing in liquid real assets, including real estate securities, listed infrastructure, commodities and natural resource equities, as well as preferred securities and other income solutions. Founded in 1986, the firm is headquartered in New York City, with offices in London, Hong Kong, Tokyo and Seattle.To view the original version on PR Newswire, visit:http://www.prnewswire.com/news-releases/cohen--steers-total-return-realty-fund-inc-rfi-adopts-monthly-distribution-policy-and-declares-distributions-for-october-november-and-december-2016-300329250.htmlReblogShareTweetShareRecently ViewedYour list is empty.What to Read NextJeff Bezos Surpasses Bill Gates as World's Richest PersonBloombergDiscover it: 4.8 out of 5 avg. by 24K+ customersDiscover CardSponsoredVerizon soars on beat, Starbucks' big China deal, AstraZeneca sinks as drug trial disappointsYahoo FinanceKristin Beck, transgender Navy SEAL hero: 'Let's meet face to face and you tell me I'm not worthy'Business InsiderVerizon soars on beat, Starbucks' big China deal, AstraZeneca sinks as drug trial disappointsYahoo Finance VideoEngineer Finds Pattern; Makes Millions in StocksMoney MorningSponsoredStocks surge to new highs as Facebook lifts NasdaqYahoo FinanceNintendo has a fiasco on its hands with the new Super Nintendo ClassicBusiness InsiderWall Street adds to record rally on strong earningsReutersThe Most Beautiful Woodstock 1969 PhotosLifestylogySponsoredThe biggest problems with putting microchips in employeesYahoo FinanceTwitter's weak monthly user numbers leave investors cold, angryYahoo Finance VideoT. Boone Pickens: 'You can just never, ever, give up'Yahoo FinanceA Penny-Crypto Miracle Making Some Americans RichAgora FinancialSponsoredA PGA Tour pro explained what separates Jordan Spieth from fellow stars like Rory McIlroy and Dustin JohnsonBusiness InsiderConservative media outlets are sending Trump a big warning on Jeff Sessions — and Trump is paying attentionBusiness InsiderAlmost Half Of Republicans Believe Trump Really Won The Popular Vote, Poll FindsJay: I love how there's literally thousands of articles every single day indirectly calling Trump supporters imbecile morons. Lol. They say it's FAKE NEWS. Is it? Most Trump supporters I know are dumber than a rock.Join the Conversation1 / 53.4k











Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft
















































































 United States


Personal Investing 




					            TRowePrice.com
					        



					            Personal Investing
					        



					            Workplace Retirement
					        



					            Institutional Investor
					        



					            Institutional Consultant
					        



					            Financial Advisor/Intermediary
					        



			            		Recordkeeping Sponsor/Consultant
			            	























Log Out
Log In


Open an Account
About Us
Help
















My Accounts





Portfolio


Transactions


Statements & Documents


Profile






Mutual Funds






Daily Prices




Historical Performance




Dividend Distributions




Mutual Fund Research Tool




Morningstar 4- and 5-Star Rated Funds




Stock Funds




Bond Funds




Target Date Funds




Asset Allocation Funds




Money Market Funds




Prospectuses & Reports







Retirement






IRA




Rollover IRA




Retirement Planning




Required Minimum Distributions




Small Business Retirement Plans




403(b) Plans







Planning & Research






Advice




Investing 101




Asset Allocation Planning




Retirement Planning




College Planning




Tax Planning




Estate Planning




Research & Analysis




T. Rowe Price Insights




Planning & Resources




Charitable Giving







Products & Services






ActivePlus Portfolios




College Savings Plans




Non Retirement Accounts




Private Asset Management




Select Client Services




Advisory Planning Services




Brokerage




Investor Centers





















T. Rowe Price Total Return Fund (PTTFX)









Home
	  	 / 
	  	 Mutual Funds









					T. Rowe Price
					
					
			
			
			
				Total Return Fund
				
			
		
	







Print this page
Email this page
Text size






Ticker Symbol:


			
				PTTFX
			
		


Fund Status:

Open to new Retail investors	   
					
					
				
				 / 
			
			
				
					
						Open to subsequent Retail investments











 





Snapshot

Objective

Performance

Composition

Management

Expenses/Minimums

Compare






		Fund Snapshot
	



Quick Stats



Current NAV
						
							as of
							
								07/26/2017
							
						



			  		
			  			
						  
						  
							$10.13
						  
						
					
				



NAV Change


					
			  			
						  
						  
							$0.02
						  
						
					
				



Daily YTD Return
							
								as of
								
									07/26/2017
								
							



						
							
								
								3.69%
							
						
					


NAV 12 Month Low-High

						
						  
						  
							
								$9.85
							
							-
							
								$10.16
							
						  
						
					



Net Assets
						
							as of
						    
								06/30/2017
						 	
						



					
						$31.50

					
					Million
				



Morningstar Ratings1


as of 06/30/2017



Overall

							
								
								
									N/A

								
							
						


3 Year

							
								
								
									N/A

								
							
						


5 Year

							
								
								
									N/A

								
							
						


10 Year

							
								
								
									N/A

								
							
						




				Morningstar rated the Total Return Fund among 
N/A,
N/A,
N/A
and 
N/A
Intermediate-Term Bond
funds for the overall rating and the 3-, 5-, and 10-year periods (as applicable) 
ending 06/30/2017, respectively.


The Overall Morningstar Rating for a managed product is derived from a weighted average of the performance 
figures associated with its three-, five-, and 10-year (if applicable) Morningstar Rating metrics. The 
weights are: 100% three-year rating for 36-59 months of total returns, 60% five-year rating/40% three-year 
rating for 60-119 months of total returns, and 50% 10-year rating/30% five-year rating/20% three-year rating 
for 120 or more months of total returns. While the 10-year overall star rating formula seems to give the most 
weight to the 10-year period, the most recent three-year period actually has the greatest impact because it is 
included in all three rating periods.
			

Performance Comparison
as of 
					
						06/30/2017
					
				







							This chart shows the value of a hypothetical $10,000 investment in the fund over the past 10 years or since its inception (for funds lacking 10-year records). The result is compared with benchmarks, which may include a broad-based market index and a peer group average or index. Market indexes do not include expenses, which are deducted from fund returns as well as mutual fund averages and indexes.
						
Benchmark Definitions



1 The Morningstar Rating for funds, or "star rating", is calculated for managed products (including mutual funds, 
variable annuity and variable life subaccounts, exchange-traded funds, closed-end funds, and separate accounts) with at 
least a three-year history. Exchange-traded funds and open-ended mutual funds are considered a single population for 
comparative purposes. It is calculated based on a Morningstar Risk-Adjusted Return measure that accounts for variation 
in a managed product's monthly excess performance, placing more emphasis on downward variations and rewarding consistent 
performance. The top 10% of products in each product category receive 5 stars, the next 22.5% receive 4 stars, the next 
35% receive 3 stars, the next 22.5% receive 2 stars, and the bottom 10% receive 1 star. The Overall Morningstar Rating 
for a managed product is derived from a weighted average of the performance figures associated with its three-, five-, 
and 10-year (if applicable) Morningstar Rating metrics. The weights are: 100% three-year rating for 36-59 months of 
total returns, 60% five-year rating/40% three-year rating for 60-119 months of total returns, and 50% 10-year rating/30% 
five-year rating/20% three-year rating for 120 or more months of total returns. While the 10-year overall star rating 
formula seems to give the most weight to the 10-year period, the most recent three-year period actually has the greatest 
impact because it is included in all three rating periods.

			

				
				
Source for Morningstar data: © 2017 Morningstar, Inc. All Rights Reserved. 
The information contained herein: (1) is proprietary to Morningstar and/or its content providers; 
(2) may not be copied or distributed; and (3) is not warranted to be accurate, complete or timely. 
Neither Morningstar nor its content providers are responsible for any damages or losses arising 
from any use of this information. Past performance is no guarantee of future results.
			



Average Annual Total Returns and Benchmarks











Benchmark Definitions

Investment Objective

			The fund seeks to maximize total return through income and capital appreciation.
		
30-Day Yield2 



Annualized Dividend
							
								as of 
								 
									(07/26/2017)
								
							



						
						
							2.87%
						
					



SEC Standardized w/ Waiver
							
								as of
								
									(06/30/2017)
								
							



						
							2.63%
						
					



SEC Standardized w/o Waiver
							
								as of
								
									(06/30/2017)
								
							



						
							1.07%
						
					


Average Annual Total Returns 3



 
MonthEnd
				06/30/2017
			
QuarterEnd
				06/30/2017
			


1 Year


				
					N/A
				
			

				
					N/A
				
			


3 Years

				
					N/A
				
			

				
					N/A
				
			


5 Years

				
					N/A
				
			

				
					N/A
				
			


10 Years

				
					N/A
				
			

				
					N/A
				
			


Since Inception

				
					
						2.68% 
						


				
					
						2.68%
						



Inception Date

						
							November 15, 2016
						
					




Gross Expense Ratio^


					
						0.72%
					
				





Net Expense Ratio^


					
						0.57%
					
				



Waiver Type

				
					
					
					
						Contractual
					
				
			


Limitation Expires

				
					
					
						
							September 30, 2018
						
					
				
			




				Current performance may be lower or higher than the quoted past performance, which cannot guarantee future results. 
Share price, principal value, yield and return will vary and you may have a gain or loss when you sell your shares.   
			



2 The 30-day dividend yield represents the average daily dividends for the 
30-day period, annualized and divided by the net asset values per share 
at the end of the period; it is available the first quarter after the 
fund's inception.  The SEC standardized yield is computed under an SEC 
standardized formula and reflects an estimated yield to maturity 
(assuming all portfolio securities are held to maturity); it is 
available the first month after the fund's inception.  
			

3
					
					Average annual total return figures include changes in principal value, reinvested dividends, and capital gain distributions. 
For funds less than one year old, the Since Inception return figure is not annualized and represents an aggregate total return.
				

^ The gross expense ratio reflects the fund expenses as stated in the fee table of the fund's 
prospectus prior to the deduction of any waiver or reimbursement. 
The net expense ratio reflects fund expenses after the deduction of any waiver or reimbursement.
If a fund has an active contractual expense ratio limitation, the expiration date is shown below the gross and net
expense ratio values above.  Expense ratios are as of the most recent prospectus.
	

























Open an Account




Transact & Trade




View/Update Accounts




Help Center












			Find a Fund
		



Select Fund By Name

Africa & Middle East - I Cl

Africa & Middle East Fund

Asia Opportunities

Asia Opportunities - I Cl

Balanced

Balanced - I Cl

Blue Chip Growth

Blue Chip Growth - I Cl

California Tax-Free Bond

California Tax-Free Bond - I Cl

California Tax-Free Money

California Tax-Free Money - I Cl

Capital Appreciation

Capital Appreciation - I Cl

Capital Opportunity

Capital Opportunity - I Cl

Cash Reserves

Corporate Income

Corporate Income - I Cl

Credit Opportunities

Credit Opportunities - I Cl

Diversified Mid-Cap Growth

Diversified Mid-Cap Growth - I Cl

Dividend Growth

Dividend Growth - I Cl

Dynamic Global Bond

Dynamic Global Bond - I Cl

Em Mkts Corporate Bond - I Cl

Em Mkts Local Currency Bond - I Cl

Emerging Europe

Emerging Europe - I Cl

Emerging Markets Bond

Emerging Markets Bond - I Cl

Emerging Markets Corporate Bond

Emerging Markets Local Currency Bond

Emerging Markets Stock

Emerging Markets Stock - I Cl

Emerging Markets Value Stock

Emerging Markets Value Stock - I Cl

Equity Income

Equity Income - I Cl

Equity Index 500

Equity Index 500 - I Cl

European Stock

European Stock - I Cl

Extended Equity Market Index

Financial Services

Financial Services - I Cl

Floating Rate

Floating Rate - I Cl

Georgia Tax-Free Bond

Georgia Tax-Free Bond - I Cl

Global Allocation

Global Allocation - I Cl

Global Consumer

Global Growth Stock

Global Growth Stock - I Cl

Global High Income Bond

Global High Income Bond - I Cl

Global Industrials

Global Industrials - I Cl

Global Multi-Sector Bond

Global Multi-Sector Bond - I Cl

Global Real Estate - I Cl

Global Real Estate Fund

Global Stock

Global Stock - I Cl

Global Technology - I Cl

Global Technology Fund

GNMA

GNMA - I Cl

Government Money

Government Money - I Cl

Growth & Income

Growth & Income - I Cl

Growth Stock

Growth Stock - I Cl

Health Sciences

Health Sciences - I Cl

High Yield

High Yield - I Cl

Inflation Protected Bond

Inflation Protected Bond - I Cl

Intermediate Tax-Free High Yield

Intermediate Tax-Free HY - I Cl

International Bond

International Bond - I Cl

International Concentrated Eq - I Cl

International Concentrated Equity

International Discovery

International Discovery - I Cl

International Equity Index

International Stock

International Stock - I Cl

International Value Equity

International Value Equity - I Cl

Japan

Japan - I Cl

Latin America

Latin America - I Cl

Limited Duration Inflation Focused Bd

Lmtd Duration Infl Focused Bd - I Cl

Maryland Short-Term Tax-Free Bond

Maryland Short-Term Tx-Fr Bnd - I Cl

Maryland Tax-Free Bond

Maryland Tax-Free Bond - I Cl

Maryland Tax-Free Money

Maryland Tax-Free Money - I Cl

Media & Telecommunications

Media & Telecommunications - I Cl

Mid-Cap Growth

Mid-Cap Growth - I Cl

Mid-Cap Value

Mid-Cap Value - I Cl

New America Growth

New America Growth - I Cl

New Asia

New Asia - I Cl

New Era

New Era - I Cl

New Horizons

New Horizons - I Cl

New Income

New Income - I Cl

New Jersey Tax-Free Bond

New Jersey Tax-Free Bond - I Cl

New York Tax-Free Bond

New York Tax-Free Bond - I Cl

New York Tax-Free Money

New York Tax-Free Money - I Cl

Overseas Stock - I Cl

Overseas Stock Fund

Personal Strategy Balanced

Personal Strategy Balanced - I Cl

Personal Strategy Growth

Personal Strategy Growth - I Cl

Personal Strategy Income

Personal Strategy Income - I Cl

QM Global Equity

QM Global Equity - I Cl

QM U.S. Small & Mid-Cap Core Eq - I Cl

QM U.S. Small & Mid-Cap Core Equity

QM U.S. Small-Cap Growth Equity

QM U.S. Small-Cap Growth Equity - I Cl

QM U.S. Value Equity

QM U.S. Value Equity - I Cl

Real Assets

Real Assets - I Cl

Real Estate

Real Estate - I Cl

Retirement 2005 Fund

Retirement 2010 Fund

Retirement 2015 Fund

Retirement 2020 Fund

Retirement 2025 Fund

Retirement 2030 Fund

Retirement 2035 Fund

Retirement 2040 Fund

Retirement 2045 Fund

Retirement 2050 Fund

Retirement 2055 Fund

Retirement 2060 Fund

Retirement Balanced Fund

Retirement Balanced I - I Cl

Retirement I 2005 - I Cl

Retirement I 2010 - I Cl

Retirement I 2015 - I Cl

Retirement I 2020 - I Cl

Retirement I 2025 - I Cl

Retirement I 2030 - I Cl

Retirement I 2035 - I Cl

Retirement I 2040 - I Cl

Retirement I 2045 - I Cl

Retirement I 2050 - I Cl

Retirement I 2055 - I Cl

Retirement I 2060 - I Cl

Retirement Income 2020

Science & Technology

Science & Technology - I Cl

Short-Term Bond

Short-Term Bond - I Cl

Small-Cap Stock

Small-Cap Stock - I Cl

Small-Cap Value

Small-Cap Value - I Cl

Spectrum Growth

Spectrum Income

Spectrum International

Summit Municipal Income

Summit Municipal Intermediate

Summit Municipal Money Market

Target 2005

Target 2005 - I Cl

Target 2010

Target 2010 - I Cl

Target 2015

Target 2015 - I Cl

Target 2020

Target 2020 - I Cl

Target 2025

Target 2025 - I Cl

Target 2030

Target 2030 - I Cl

Target 2035

Target 2035 - I Cl

Target 2040

Target 2040 - I Cl

Target 2045

Target 2045 - I Cl

Target 2050

Target 2050 - I Cl

Target 2055

Target 2055 - I Cl

Target 2060

Target 2060 - I Cl

Tax-Efficient Equity - I Cl

Tax-Efficient Equity Fund

Tax-Exempt Money

Tax-Exempt Money - I Cl

Tax-Free High Yield

Tax-Free High Yield - I Cl

Tax-Free Income

Tax-Free Income - I Cl

Tax-Free Short-Intermediate

Tax-Free Short-Intermediate - I Cl

Total Equity Market Index

Total Return

Total Return - I Cl

U.S. Bond Enhanced Index

U.S. High Yield

U.S. High Yield - I Cl

U.S. Large-Cap Core - I Cl

U.S. Large-Cap Core Fund

U.S. Treasury Intermediate

U.S. Treasury Intermediate - I Cl

U.S. Treasury Long-Term

U.S. Treasury Long-Term - I Cl

U.S. Treasury Money

U.S. Treasury Money - I Cl

Ultra Short-Term Bond

Ultra Short-Term Bond - I Cl

Value

Value - I Cl

Virginia Tax-Free Bond

Virginia Tax-Free Bond - I Cl




Select By Ticker Symbol
GTFBX
MDXBX
NJTFX
NYTXX
OTCFX
OTIIX
PBDIX
PCCOX
PCTXX
PDGIX
PEXMX
PGLOX
PGMSX
PGTIX
PIEQX
PNAIX
PNSIX
POMIX
PPIPX
PRAFX
PRAMX
PRASX
PRCIX
PRCNX
PRCOX
PRCPX
PRDGX
PRDMX
PRDSX
PREFX
PREIX
PRELX
PREMX
PRESX
PRFDX
PRFHX
PRFRX
PRFSX
PRGFX
PRGIX
PRGMX
PRGSX
PRGTX
PRHIX
PRHSX
PRHYX
PRIDX
PRIHX
PRIJX
PRIKX
PRINX
PRIPX
PRISX
PRITX
PRIUX
PRJIX
PRJPX
PRKIX
PRLAX
PRMDX
PRMSX
PRMTX
PRNEX
PRNHX
PRNYX
PRPIX
PRRXX
PRSCX
PRSGX
PRSIX
PRSMX
PRSNX
PRSVX
PRTAX
PRTIX
PRTXX
PRUFX
PRUIX
PRULX
PRUUX
PRVAX
PRVIX
PRWAX
PRWBX
PRWCX
PRXAX
PRXCX
PRXEX
PRXIX
PRZIX
PSILX
PTEXX
PTKIX
PTTFX
PTYIX
RBAIX
RCLIX
REIPX
REVIX
RGGIX
RICIX
RJAIX
RLAIX
RPBAX
RPEIX
RPGAX
RPGEX
RPGIX
RPGRX
RPIBX
RPIEX
RPIHX
RPISX
RPMGX
RPOIX
RPSIX
RPTFX
RPTIX
RPTTX
TBCIX
TBGAX
TBSIX
TCBXX
TCFEX
TCRRX
TECIX
TEEFX
TEIMX
TERXX
TEUIX
TFAIX
TFBIX
TFBVX
TFHAX
TFIFX
TFILX
TFRRX
TGAFX
TGIPX
TGTIX
THISX
TICCX
TIDDX
TIIPX
TIRGX
TIRRX
TMDXX
TOORX
TORFX
TPGPX
TPPAX
TQAIX
TQGEX
TQGIX
TQMVX
TQSIX
TQSMX
TQVIX
TRAIX
TRAMX
TRAOX
TRARX
TRASX
TRBCX
TRBFX
TRBRX
TRBUX
TRECX
TREMX
TRFFX
TRFGX
TRFOX
TRFWX
TRGAX
TRGLX
TRGRX
TRGXX
TRHRX
TRIGX
TRJIX
TRLAX
TRLDX
TRMCX
TRMIX
TRMUX
TRNEX
TRNXX
TROIX
TROSX
TRPAX
TRPBX
TRPCX
TRPDX
TRPFX
TRPHX
TRPIX
TRPJX
TRPKX
TRPLX
TRPMX
TRPNX
TRPPX
TRPTX
TRRAX
TRRBX
TRRCX
TRRDX
TRREX
TRRFX
TRRGX
TRRHX
TRRIX
TRRJX
TRRKX
TRRLX
TRRMX
TRRNX
TRROX
TRRTX
TRRUX
TRRVX
TRRWX
TRSGX
TRSTX
TRSXX
TRTFX
TRTIX
TRULX
TRVLX
TRVVX
TRXRX
TRYIX
TSCXX
TSNIX
TTEEX
TTGXX
TTMIX
TTOIX
TTRTX
TTSIX
TTURX
TUHIX
TUHYX
TWNXX
TWRRX


More






Fund Information



Download a Prospectus
Download a Semi-Annual Report
Download an Annual Report
Download Statement of Additional Information
Year-End Dividend Distributions
Year-End Tax Considerations
Dividend Distribution Dates

 





Related Links



Also available to certain investors as a lower cost I Class mutual fund.



























Our Mission Is Simple.
	          Help clients around the world achieve their long-term investment goals. 
	        


Connect with us
Facebook
Twitter
YouTube
LinkedIn




Company Overview
Responsibility
Careers
Investor Relations
Press Releases




Site Map
Privacy Policy
Terms of Use
Security Measures
Legal Information
Customer Agreement




Feedback
Mobile Solutions
Contact Us







The mutual funds referred to in this website are offered and sold only to persons residing in the United States and are offered by prospectus only. The prospectuses include investment objectives, risks, fees, expenses, and other information that you should read and consider carefully before investing.
Download a prospectus.

					©Thu Jul 27 11:34:42 EDT 2017. All Rights Reserved. T. Rowe Price Investment Services, Inc., distributor, T. Rowe Price mutual funds. T. ROWE PRICE, INVEST WITH CONFIDENCE, and the bighorn sheep design are trademarks of T. Rowe Price Group, Inc. 
					All other trademarks are the property of their respective owners. 
				











Morningstar 4- and 5-Star Rated Funds - Mutual Funds | T. Rowe Price | T. Rowe Price























 















Home
Mutual Funds
Morningstar 4- and 5-Star Rated Funds









Over 70 of our funds have earned 4- or 5-star Overall Morningstar Ratings as of 6/30/17.*









Invest Now

Call us at 877-495-1138



Download a Prospectus












Morningstar 4- and 5-Star Rated Funds




Stock Funds



U.S. Stock Funds



International and Global Stock Funds




Bond Funds



U.S. Bond Funds



International and Global Bond Funds




Target Date Funds



Retirement Funds



Target Funds



Income Funds




Asset Allocation Funds




Money Market Funds










                Find a fund
			














Browse all T. Rowe Price
 mutual funds
















Many of our mutual funds earn Morningstar’s highest ratings
Morningstar 4- and 5-Star Rated Funds







Because of our disciplined approach to investing, Morningstar, a leader in independent investment research, recognizes many of our mutual funds with its highest ratings in the funds' respective categories.

Over 70 of our funds have earned 4- or 5-star Overall Morningstar Ratings as of 6/30/17.*

Morningstar uses a 5-star system to rate mutual funds based on their risk-adjusted returns. Five stars is the highest while one star is the lowest rating. Only the top 32.5% of all funds (of the 32.5%, 10% get 5 stars and 22.5% get 4 stars) are awarded Morningstar's 4- or 5-star rating. By comparison, as of 6/30/17, 72 of 108 of our rated funds (Investor Class only) received an overall rating of 5 or 4 stars.​ Past performance cannot guarantee future results.

View all 4- and 5-star rated funds
 

Explore Morningstar 4- and 5-Star Rated Funds




Fund Name(ticker)
  


MorningstarCategory
  


Overall MorningstarRating™
  


No. ofFunds InCategory
  


Risk/RewardPotential**
  








Fund Name (ticker)

Morningstar Category

Overall Morningstar Rating™

No. of Funds In Category
Risk/Reward Potential









Compare Morningstar 4- and 5-Star Rated Funds












	            Find a fund
	        












Browse all T. Rowe Price mutual funds










T. Rowe Price Insights&reg



Markets & Economy

Monthly Market Review


		                        					Stay informed about global economic developments and our perspective on market conditions. Read more...






														
							    							 
							    							
														                    
		                							
		                  							Source:
		                  							
			                    						T. Rowe Price
		                    							
		                							
	                   							






Markets & Economy

Global Markets Weekly Update


		                        					Keep up-to-date on our views on developments in global capital markets. Read more...






														
							    							
							    							                      
								        						July 21, 2017 
							    							
														                    
		                							
		                  							Source:
		                  							
			                    						T. Rowe Price
		                    							
		                							
	                   							










All mutual funds are subject to market risk, including possible loss of principal.
*Morningstar gives its best ratings of 5 or 4 stars to the top 32.5% of all funds (of the 32.5%, 10% get 5 stars and 22.5% get 4 stars) based on their risk-adjusted returns. The Overall Morningstar Rating™ is derived from a weighted average of the performance figures associated with a fund's 3-, 5-, and 10-year (if applicable) Morningstar Rating™ metrics. As of 6/30/17, 72 of 108 of our rated funds (Investor class only) received an overall rating of 5 or 4 stars.
The Morningstar RatingTM for funds, or "star rating", is calculated for funds with at least a three-year history. Exchange-traded funds and open-ended mutual funds are considered a single population for comparative purposes. It is calculated based on a Morningstar Risk-Adjusted Return measure that accounts for variation in a managed product's monthly excess performance, placing more emphasis on downward variations and rewarding consistent performance. The top 10% of products in each product category receive 5 stars, the next 22.5% receive 4 stars, the next 35% receive 3 stars, the next 22.5% receive 2 stars, and the bottom 10% receive 1 star.

Source for Morningstar data: ©2017 Morningstar, Inc. All Rights Reserved. The information contained herein: (1) is proprietary to Morningstar and/or its content providers; (2) may not be copied or distributed; and (3) is not warranted to be accurate, complete or timely. Neither Morningstar nor its content providers are responsible for any damages or losses arising from any use of this information. Past performance is no guarantee of future results.
**This chart displays relative risk of each U.S. mutual fund listed using standard deviation of returns. Those values are provided in the bars at the top of the chart.
Methodology: We evaluate the standard deviation and its resulting placement within a specific risk/return category on an annual basis. A fund is generally placed in a risk/return category based on the 10-year standard deviation of its performance. If a fund is less than 10 years old, the actual fund performance history is supplemented with the primary prospectus benchmark history to obtain a full 10-year history, or longest time period available up to 10 years. For an Asset Allocation fund with less than 10 years of performance history, sub-strategy returns are used. When a sub-strategy is less than 10 years old, the actual sub-strategy performance history is supplemented with benchmark history to obtain a full 10-year history, or longest time period available up to 10 years.
Risk return categories overlap; a fund with a standard deviation in the overlap between two categories, denoted by a plus (+), is placed so that its risk categorization is better aligned with anticipated return characteristics an investor may experience going forward at the discretion of T Rowe Price.
When a fund has a cash-like benchmark, denoted by a double plus (++), its standard deviation is estimated using only available fund returns. If the fund is less than 10 years old, benchmark returns are not used to obtain a full 10-year history because they would artificially suppress the volatility estimate.
All investments are subject to market risk, including the possible loss of principal. Standard deviation of returns, a measure of price volatility, is one measure of risk. Please consult the funds’ prospectuses for a more complete discussion of the funds’ risks.
+ California Tax-Free Money Fund, Capital Appreciation Fund, Equity Income Fund, Global Allocation Fund, Global Industrials Fund, GNMA Fund, Inflation Protected Bond Fund, International Bond Fund, International Stock Fund, Japan Fund, Limited Duration Inflation Focused Bond Fund, New Era Fund, Personal Strategy Balanced Fund, Personal Strategy Income Fund, QM Global Equity Fund, QM Global Equity Fund, QM U.S. Value Equity Fund, Retirement 2015 Fund, Retirement 2035 Fund, Retirement 2040 Fund, Retirement 2045 Fund, Retirement 2050 Fund, Retirement 2055 Fund, Retirement 2060 Fund, Short-Term Bond Fund, Spectrum International Fund, Summit Municipal Intermediate Fund, Target 2010 Fund, Target 2025 Fund, Target 2050 Fund, Target 2055 Fund, Target 2060 Fund, Tax-Free Short-Intermediate Fund, Total Equity Market Index Fund, Ultra Short-Term Bond Fund
++ Global Unconstrained Bond Fund






















Roth or Traditional IRA  | T. Rowe Price





















 
















Home
Retirement
IRA
Roth or Traditional IRA 












Roth or Traditional IRA
Compare Roth and Traditional IRAs














Roth IRA
Traditional IRA
Roth or Traditional IRA 
Rollover and Transfer IRAs



    	Navigate To...
        



Roth IRA
Traditional IRA
Roth or Traditional IRA 
Rollover and Transfer IRAs





















When it comes to making a thoughtful decision between a Roth IRA and a Traditional IRA, it helps to understand the differences.










 
Roth IRA
Traditional IRA
Taxes
Contributions made are not deductible.
Contributions made can be tax-deductible or non-deductible. Deductibility of contributions depends on active participation in a retirement plan and your modified adjusted gross income (MAGI) not exceeding certain amounts.
Withdrawal of contributions

Withdraw anytime without taxes or penalties.
Withdraw anytime but deductible contributions are taxable and generally subject to penalties if withdrawn before age 59½.

Withdrawal of Earnings
Tax- and penalty-free when withdrawn at age 59½ if account has been active for at least five years.

Taxable when withdrawn and generally subject to penalties if withdrawn before age 59½.

Age restrictions
None.  
Must be under age 70½ during the tax year of the contribution.

Eligibility
May contribute only if, depending on filing status, MAGI does not exceed certain amounts. You must have US earned income.

No restrictions on contributions. You must have US earned income.  
Required minimum distributions (RMDs)
None during your lifetime.
Must begin taking for the year in which you reach age 70½.














Ready to Start? Call 1-877-583-2153









                        Open a Roth IRA
                    














                        Open a Traditional IRA
                    























Still Unsure About Roth vs. Traditional?











				    
						
				        
				            Answer four questions to find out which IRA may be right for you








































Why T. Rowe Price for a Roth or Traditional IRA?





Low Fees and Minimums.




 



You need to maximize your return potential, so we work to keep our fees competitive. That's why our solutions include no-load mutual funds with low expense ratios. Keep in mind that a Traditional IRA/Roth IRA may be subject to an annual fee, and a fee may be assessed when a Traditional IRA/Roth IRA is closed. Here's more information on fees.



















Convenient and Flexible Fund Choices.




 



You can choose from target date funds with strategic asset allocation and diversification, or select from more than 100 mutual funds to suit your investing needs.






            
                
                    
                    Download a Prospectus
                    
                
	            
	        
	    



















A Global Investing Network in Pursuit of Your Goals.




 



Our highly tenured global investment professionals are continuously assessing potential risk, while identifying opportunities to maximize growth potential over the long term so you have more money in retirement.  





























Want to Move Existing Savings Into a Roth IRA?

















Roll over a 401(k)













A Rollover IRA is one of several options to consider for your former workplace retirement plan, such as a 401(k).
 
Explore your options
Roll over now
 

















Transfer an existing IRA












If you decide to transfer an IRA, we offer over 100 mutual funds from which to choose. And we make it easy by handling most of the paperwork, too.
Transfer an IRA now


















Convert your T. Rowe Price Traditional IRA to a Roth IRA









A Roth IRA offers many advantages over a Traditional IRA, like potentially tax-free withdrawals if you need them.
Convert now




































404 Page Not Found















Page Not Found




We apologize for any inconvenience, but we are unable to locate the page you requested. 
                                This could be due to either of the reasons below: 


                                    If you manually entered the URL, please make sure it is correct. 
                                    Check that the capitalization matches, that all words are spelled correctly, 
                                    and that all the punctuation, like periods (.) and slashes (/) are correctly placed. 
                                    Be sure that you are using the forward slash (/) and not the backward slash (\). 
                                    Remember, there are no spaces in URLs.
                                

                                    If you have bookmarked this page, this page may have been renamed, moved, or deleted. 
                                    Please return to our homepage, and reset your bookmarks.
                                









